Our attacking display yesterday couldn’t be faulted. Some of the link up play between Welbeck and Rooney was first class, with Rooney’s second goal demonstrating that both players have grown a good understanding of each other and bringing back memories of Yorke & Cole against Barca in 99. Welbeck took his goal very well, a little side step/shimmy just made him enough room to get the shot off allowing him to exquisitely place it into the top corner. Nani’s goal was a well worked piece of play mixing up one and two touch passing with great movement, with Welbeck again playing a huge part in the goal – his excellent first time pass split the defence giving Nani space and time to calmly dink the ball over a sliding Howard. Yesterdays attacking display shown we are capable of finding the back of the net, and that we are dangerous going forward but unfortunately all the good attacking work was let down with poor defending.
“Whosoever transgresseth, and abideth not in the doctrine of Christ, hath not God. He that abideth in the doctrine of Christ, he hath both the Father and the Son. If there come any unto you, and bring not this doctrine, receive him not into your house, neither bid him God speed: for he that biddeth him God speed is partaker of his evil deeds.” 2 John 9-11
So now I am just spending a quiet day working on some projects for the coming week and enjoying the great weather. I mean, sunny and maaaybe 80 out? PERF.
Today I awoke with a dilemma on my hands. . . which unfinished project to work on. I bounced from Signe's room, to the laundry room, to the living room, to the guest room and back again, but every project in progress needed supplies--and I didn't want to run to the fabric store or the hardware store, I just wanted to get to work on something. I finally settled on painting trim in the kitchen/family room. Mostly because my husband suggested it might be time. . . since we put that trim up nearly two years ago! But once I got all dressed in painting clothes I changed my mind. I wanted something with a good before and after picture, and while I could post pictures of the kitchen remodel, I didn't want to post after pictures until it was actually all done AND decorated. Which left one other thing I could work on. Something I bought supplies for 1 year and 4 months ago. Clearly I need to work on completing the projects I start. It is one of my resolutions for the year actually--Finish all half done projects! I am very good at the starting part.
I excuse myself to change Bug's diaper.
You were gone way too long
Self: “We do that here too.” (to questioner) “Is that called glottal drift or something?”
2. Brokeback Mountain (Heath Ledger & Jake Gyllenhaal) - The rare film I can watch again & again. Both actors were brilliant, the final scene emotionally devastating. Just utter perfection.
If you like history this is an interesting place to visit. You can pick up a brochure in front of the museum (one of the old officer’s quarters) and take a self-guided tour, or plan to spend a few hours with the docents one Saturday morning.
Where’s the apoplectic outrage by the Left? Where’s the overdue contrite apologies from The Religion of Peace?
Happy Friday everyone, I hope you all have a good weekend.
with Rosemary Oil & Date Syrup
Lucy raised the volume of her tantrum.
One of the questions analysts asked Apple's CEO Tim Cook during the financial results call yesterday was for his views on the future for a converged device such as a cleverly designed notebook pc that can also be used as a tablet. Analysts and many parts of the media just don't seem to understand that it isn't about what it's possible to build (however cleverly). It is about the user experience. Time and time again this mistake is made by forecasters and pundits. Within Apple, it is ingrained corporate understanding.
Times are hard, competition is fierce, so I am delighted that I have finally persuaded my publisher to reduce the Kindle price of my two novels, Dead Ernest and The Birds, the Bees and Other Secrets.
Screw them. We're closed. Go back to that shithole continent you call home and that we call Africa. Stay there. Deal with the Somalians. Straighten your own messes out.
Packages should be sent in a timely manner with the intent of receipt no more than one month after being informed of the destination.
David Howard / Unemployment - Paperwork / 67
It's been a year ago,I am living a hard situation,I can't focus,create as i want to,I am failing in all my stuff,my friends,this is because I have this anxiety,hypochondria and fears...
The AAC was closed to the public in 1986, after a new Austin Recreation Center was built, on stilts, nearby. The AAC received further damage in later floods and from rain falling through holes in the roof. According to a 2005 Austin Public Works Department report, at least two-thirds of the building is totally beyond repair, so any restoration of the building would be more of a “re-creation” (pun unintended).
Just a couple of weeks ago, I answered a question on a blog: what would you not purchase high-end? My answer was mascara. It’s something that you are supposed to throw away after three months, plus I had never been amazed by a non-drugstore mascara, so what was the point?
1) I use the word ‘that’ too much
Ravishing Rosettes by Smadar Grossman.
Nothing much is going on at the moment. It will take many moons to clean and organize everything.
Head out in Soho, Wanchai or Lan Kwai Fong to experience the night life in HK. It’s pretty rowdy and often a bit feral, but when in Rome right? There are a few nice bars in the LKF Building on Wyndam Street on HK Island, and a secret little speak easy style bar in a basement in the Central Wet Markets on Graham Street (a favorite of mine).
Arthur was set to be executed on March 29 for the 1982 murder-for-hire killing of Muscle Shoals businessman Troy Wicker.
Ollie stood up and started forwards. His mother held out her hand and it fizzled and crackled in the air.
'OH MY GAWDDDDD!'
In this hilariously candid debut novel from comedian Aaron Karo—who grew up with a few obsessions and compulsions of his own—very bad things are going to happen to Chuck. But maybe that’s a good thing. Because with graduation looming, Chuck finds himself with one last chance to face his inner demons, defend his best friend, and win over the girl of his dreams. No matter what happens, though, he’ll have to get his hands dirty.
To a degree the fear of the Protestant state was understandable. After all, in 1570 Pius V issued Regnans in Excelsis, a bull describing Elizabeth I as a heretic, releasing her subjects from obeying her orders and threatening excommunication against any who did. Elizabeth, who had hitherto pursued a policy of toleration, had little choice but to begin a campaign of repression, particularly against perceived agents of the Vatican. The Jesuits were obvious targets, but even ordinary priests were drawn into the net.
No that I have blown my nose from crying, let's get back to business...
First, some very sad news, I don’t think that the injured fox squirrel is going to pull through. If this were the old days when I walked out in the woods someplace and it were safe for me to do so, I would put the poor little guy out of his misery. As much as I dislike the idea of killing anything, seeing a critter suffer makes me even sadder, and he is suffering. It broke my heart to see him, and it put a damper on what otherwise would have been a great day.
'It's from a book title by Barbara Kingsolver.'
Here's the next revision:
A presto, see you soon
Sometimes I just want to lock myself away and wait for it to all end. Sometimes I am glad to have access to medication that can make me more human less monster. Sometimes I miss being a monster – I admit it. Sometimes I am glad I am not hurting those around me – I admit it. Sometimes I wonder how long I can play this game and sometimes I’m glad I get to play at all
Here is the courtyard of Jamie’s school, it is also the setting for the Missionaries of the Poor dinners I have organised. Imagine 16 tables, at night, with tiny white lights above.
So family that has helped by giving birthday gifts of $...they and WE are so so so THANKFUL!
29. The country has an area of 30,414 square miles (78,772 km²)
We all held hands & looked up at the Stars & simultaneously made a Wish!!! ***
Now on to our regularly scheduled program ...
[Image]Ask someone not playing the game to print off the instructions, cut them into separate strips, fold them and put them in an envelope.
Some other comparisons I received were:
To roll out the pasta, on a lightly floured surface, cut the dough into six or eight pieces. Working one piece at a time, fashion each piece into a rough rectangle, then pass it through your pasta machine on the widest setting . Fold dough in half or in thirds and pass it through again. Then fold and pass it through one more time.
You say Keen-wa. I say Quinn-oh-ah.
I'm still considered a contractor, but now I'm in a situation that's called "contract to hire". How exciting. What exactly does that mean, you may ask? I have no bloody idea, I may answer, but I'm keeping my nose clean, my mind open, and my fingers crossed, hoping that I may leverage my, charm and good looks, along with my kick-ass project management skills, into a full time, permanent gig. We shall see.
But I'm just so tired, I have nothing left.
Ink: Pacific Point (#111837), VersaMark (#102283)
Dad reassured me today that we definitely lived in England. He also emphasised that this was record-breakingly wet weather we were having, and it was all down to something called a hose pipe band.
“The Most Beautiful Girl In The World” is the song all the fellas secretly wish they can write for their loved ones. Secretly because “real” mean don’t say sappy things like, “It’s plain to see you’re the reason God made a girl.” Hell no, “real” men don’t talk like that. Yet, this is what men wish to express to their loved ones, they’re the most beautiful girl in the world.
The state-run media reported that 271 people were injured during the afternoon accident in the Shanghai Metro system. Xinhua, the official news agency, said that equipment failure was believed to be responsible and that the accident was under investigation.
Case in point: after gaining independence from the British in 1963 (like us) and gaining status as an independent Republic in 1965 (after being booted out of Malaysia), Singapore has become a highly-developed market-based economy which is known as the freest, most innovative, most competitive and most business-friendly. Singapore is ranked second in the 2011Index of Economic Freedom and one of the least corrupt countries in the world on the Corruption Perceptions Index. True, the islands of Singapore are very conveniently located, geographically speaking but heck, so is Kenya. Andwe’re the same age! We seriously have no excuse except possibly the mismanagement of out leaders. That we voted in (actually, you did, because I’m not old enough to vote yet :p ). So yeah, no excuse.
-You have figured out how to take your diaper off.
Talk with you in a few days!
Credit first goes to Natalia O. for luring me there with our friend PW. Sucking it up I thought to myself, “its a lovely Saturday.. and we are going into the subway?!!” Getting out on the first stop of the L-train, its another 15-minute walk, long enough to get the ever-so-classic “are we there yet?! I have to go potty!!” quip. Seriously, you can almost name the block by which Manhattan centrics (which I admit includes myself) start getting worried because either their mental map back to the Bedford station – and thus a chance for a safe return to civilization – is being pushed to its limits, or they’re running out of bread crumbs to follow in case of a retreat.
The church states that only man has a soul and animals do not. I firmly do not believe this for several reasons. The first question we must raise here is what actually is the soul? Many people whom I have asked say it is what gives us life and what gives us personality. We say things like "He has a kind soul" or even "She has a dark soul"
Right. Enough about my craft classes now. We will be back to other craft projects for the next post (yes I have been tackling at least one!).
So it all sums down to this: you get two options:
I have actually not seen players doing this, which makes me much happier with the population. I am sure it happens, as there are always players that feel like they must be bullies to others and show their abilities to those of a lower level. Personally I don’t get it, but it happens. It’s human nature.
Rows 16- 20: Knit
Now, as far as The Dilemma. It was OK.
The Faders were based in Ballymoney in Northern Ireland. They perfected their blend of pub rock and new wave by playing regularly at Spuds in Portstewart, as well as other venues in the nearby towns of Coleraine and Portrush as part of the 'Golden Triangle' scene with other bands like The Cramp and Xdreamysts.
He slammed mainstream media for its “completely biased and unfair” coverage of the rally.
Enough of the yuck stuff. Bryan and Christine came a few days after we got there, so we got to hang with The (Ruston) Smith gang alone for a while! It was really fun! We met B and C in Shreveport for some delish mexican on their way into town. Wooo Hooo for a date night! (*Thanks, G Daddy and Jenna!)
It's always a good idea to clean the dryer's lint filter before using it. That will make a big difference in the time required for drying.
I wanted to share my morning message from the universe again:
“There was no time for preparations, only prayer,” she said. “I felt utterly hopeless thinking I might be spending my last moments on Earth curled up on the stockroom floor.”
Even if we die, something else will live on unless the molten iron core cools and no longer emits a magnetic field to protect us from solar radiation and the atmosphere blows away through infinite space. Life finds a way. Whether humans will or not is their own prerogative.
(I wish I did not so abhor the tangible; I wish I did not so love it.)
To this point, all the tearing out has been completed and everything going forward is construction. I'll have to post more details as we go, but here are a couple of pre and post tear out photos.
Okay so seeing as you’re already in the city for the markets, you can’t go past the German Sausage Hut without handing over 7 dollars for one of their amazing concoctions. I say choose your sausage and add everything (souerkraut, ketchup and mustard). We chose to eat ours as we walked across the bridge to the Southbank Markets.
The next time you feel like GOD can’t use you, just remember
In my case, that means, if I walk to the toilet and back, it takes almost 24 hours before I have enough muscle power/strength to walk the same distance again. So it means I don't have enough muscle strength/power to walk, to sit or stand, which means that I have now been bedridden 24/7 and dependent on others for many many years.
Once the birds are shot, the bird boys and their canine partners collect them and after each hunter's killings are put on paper, the birds are used as bait to catch paranas or you can eat it barbecued. Matt says they are quite tender and tasty.
This is a chronicle about the labyrinth.
For those of you who haven't read the book, here's some crib notes. Holden Cauflield, 15, from a well-off family, is kicked out of his prep school. This is a theme with him. He hates phonies. Another big theme. But, he, himself is incongruent. He likes children (in a non-creepy way) as they remind him of innocence and he wants to help protect this innocence (the book's title comes from this desire). His younger brother died from leukaemia at age 11 and Holden still talks to him. He may have been molested. He wants attention and affection, but pushes people away. Over the course of a few days in December, Holden hides out in New York City, avoiding his parents (who do not know he's been expelled). His erratic behaviour culminates in him being placed "here" (although never named, it is inferred to be a sanatorium).
What Creative Time Says: Here, culture is public storage.
12. Gogo Train (8:31)
6. Oh! Atlanta
“Essential to catch the 10.35 if you would see mother,” he read.
Knowing what blogging platform is best for you is f'ing hard.
‘Celebrity’ is part of the London Fringe Festival
John Cheever, The Wapshot Scandal – the sequel to The Wapshot Chronicle, which I have read
I am not what you would call irresponsible with money. I sock away dollars from each and every paycheck for my 401(k), a Roth IRA, the Geej's college fund, a savings account for my goddaughter, my regular old savings account and a high-dollar life insurance policy that will take care of BH and The Geej should I ever kick the bucket. No one taught me to do this. It's just something that I've always done. I'm a "rainy day" kind of gal. But the very FEW times I've been an idiot with my money, I've had a helluva lot of fun.
Since the SWP is big on ‘class analysis’, they can hardly fault me for my approach to the thoroughly middle-class, and often even upper middle-class, nature of the SWP/UAF - or, at the least, of its leaders and theorists over the years.
This post ends with what might portentiously be called the “meaning” of the film. The characters, as I’ve said, are all types, defined by their tasks. Many of these are tied with their outfits – the suits of the assassins, the tuxedo of the fixer, the dress of the moll. Each sequence is marked by the major characters changing their clothes.
They worked...ok...? The ones on top never really got to a soft, cooked noodle state- they mostly crisped up even though I had covered them with tomato sauce.
What is known as Cultural Maexism replaced liberalism in the 1960s after a series of demonstrations and sit-ins in Western universities, notably Berkely and the LSE; and the streets of France. It began by calling itself New Liberalism but replaced the Liberal idea of individual rights with that of “group rights” which means ethnic minorities arfe victims and have claims upon Whites who are portrayed as “oppressors”. It also uses identity politics which is inverse Nazism. There is the action and behaviour of New Liberals shows little concept of political democracy or individual freedom under the rule of law. The democratic political system was viewed as an enemy to be captured, manipulated and subdued until it gives way to a spoils system whereby power is distributed between interest groups favoured by race, sex and gender.
you would have never seen or felt without them.
Shan gave me an award. Cool! You can read the meme rules and stuff on her blog. I am breaking all the rules except the fourth one, which requires me to tell you--my versatile (chaotic?) audience--seven random things about me.
Christan: Did you ever feel like it was your fault?
*Remember, the swaps don't have to be 100 percent monetarily equitable, they just have to meet a need or want that exists. Be creative. Put up notices at church and in your support group newsletters. Pray about it and God will provide.
The attack, which took place Friday night, was first revealed by the governor of Helmand Province, Muhammad Gulab Mangal, on Monday. His spokesman, Dawoud Ahmadi, said that after an investigation they had determined that a family home in the Sangin district had been attacked by mistake in the American airstrike, which was called in to respond to a Taliban attack.
Here’s a great video from ABC News on some summer saving tips:
Close on 2 decades after Apartheid ended, failing high school pupils are told that the reason they can’t do Mathematics at school is because Apartheid made it difficult. These kids weren’t even born under the previous regime. Yet Apartheid South Africa produced some of the most brilliant minds in people of colour. Contrary to popular belief, they didn’t manage to study in exile. Most of them obtained world-class qualifications at South African universities. The same qualifications which obtained after 2000 are often laughed at in first world countries, because they are not worth the paper scribbled on. Such is the collapse of not only infrastructure, but also standards.
last. And it feels so good.”
Obviously the wide spread litigation brought against oil, gas, and coal producers by EPA, Mr. Armendariz’s speech confirms that the crucifixion is well underway. The EPA is at war with these industries, and winning.
Overall, CO was crazy. Lots of work, lots of brewery-hopping, great food, and even better people, you know, the kind that ACTUALLY have conversations with you when you make eye contact.
our dentist doesn't work on thursdays.
What moved me most about Brian's Holy Spirit filled words was his delight and awe of God. Brian had found "paradise," and it was better than anything he had ever known. His excitement reminded me that I dwell in this paradise daily. I rest in green meadows and walk by peaceful streams (Psalm 23). God's presence is so much a part of my life that I think I sometimes forget what I have.
This is only a portion of what i am talking about
For this week's challenge we want to see something that has been punched or die or have both on your card. The only stipulation the challenge has is no back linking to work already posted - only new work to be linked please.
I live in a city that is used to snow. We're right smack in the middle of the Canadian prairies. We know snow. We know winter. We have the infrastructure to deal with such situations. Weather will rarely stop the city from running as usual.
The prisoners managed to get hold of a policeman’s firearm and then ordered the policemen to unlock their cell door.
RAYAGADA, India, Apr 27, 2012 (IPS) – Tribal farmer Harish Saraka has rediscovered the key to sustainable farming in this rain-dependent hinterland of eastern Odisha state – mixed cropping. Link: http://www.ipsnews.net/news.asp?idnews=107597
So while some of these images may be somewhat “typical” of their location, others are not. And I doubt that you see anything like these scenes in the area postcard racks. When you go out photographing, don’t feel compelled to do the normal, touristy shot. Do something different. Make it yours.
Me: Yes. I can see how you would misunderstand that.
"These shoes," it ran, "were dug up in the moat of Holdernesse Hall. They are for the use of horses, but they are shaped below with a cloven foot of iron, so as to throw pursuers off the track. They are supposed to have belonged to some of the marauding Barons of Holdernesse in the Middle Ages."
I stood in front of the bathroom mirror running my hands over the marks he’d left on me. Little nibbles and scratches, like sexual graffiti on my skin. Flashes of his flesh surged through my mind and I smiled as I fantasized about what we could do the next time.
In the case of Microsoft v. i4i, some of Microsoft’s amici contended that the clear and convincing evidentiary standard has a “compelling effect on jurors” and that it is “tremendously difficult to persuade a jury to go against the decision of the Patent Office.”
I have the 50's house, I think I should have some 50's-like furniture, too. Only microfiber. Because - well, we have a goddamn PEEING DOG.*
4. What is one of your biggest regrets? (yeah I know, everything happens for a reason, but still what is something you wish you had done differently?)
The fire was higher than it had looked from within the Sherim, and Rel beat embers from his trouser-legs, cursing. Then thought caught up; Dora.
Gritting more teeth, I arranged the shawl in such a way that the scallops would soak in a dark turquoise dyebath for several hours, so the bottom of the shawl would be darker than the top. Then I flopped the upper section into the dyebath and cranked up the heat.
This is why I carve out so much time in our week to play games:
This is absolutely one of my favorite dishes, and for a number of reasons;
Of course, we broke them up and all that...but after, I did have to hide out in the kitchen and laugh.
Instead of minty cream filling, you can substitute strawberry, raspberry, orange, coffee or any other flavouring that you like with chocolate.
12-Sound Dimension-The Thing
"What the people really want to see is republicans and democrats hammering out their differences, negotiating and getting bills passed. That's what Congress is supposed to do."
Ravel—a 20th-century musical impressionist along with his compatriot Claude Debussy—wrote a lot of gorgeous music. If all you know of his work is the aforementioned Boléro, then you all are missing out on some seriously beautiful stuff.
* Imagine, if you will, the conversation as the 8 year old clutches the YA GN; the parent saying the kid loves comics; and you trying to explain how that book is perfect for teens but not for 8 year olds. But it's comics, the well meaning parent says. Making GNs specifically for the younger crowd is not just good marketing; it's responding to a need. Tied into that is the person of any age staring at a graphic novel and saying "but it doesn't look funny... aren't comics supposed to be funny?"
For a whole different conversation... I had chili planned for dinner tonight and then read this post from Melissa and decided "what the heck?" I will use her chili recipe.. Oh my...it was GOOD! So if you are like me and need a good chili recipe that freezes well...try it.. you won't be disappointed. I will say that I won't be adding the tablespoon of jalapeno or the 1 cup of water to the next batch. It was a bit spicy for us and Rich likes his a bit less juicy... otherwise he said he really liked it better than my regular chili recipe which I have been using for 39 years with no complaints... lol
Miscibility - a potion miscibility table with a hundred different results. Significantly greater chance of things going wrong as compared to the classic table - might want to save this for the yahoo that drinks four potions at once. Although there's some beneficial stuff on there as well, along with the standard results from the DMG, just not in the same proportions.
Yes, those words were always quite clear though never addressed at me. They would get screamed at the last person to get on her last nerve that day – usually about ten minutes into an hour-long class – and it meant to go sit in the hall until class was over.
Is there any way that I could get an Asian lady to transplant her hair onto my head? Let’s face it. Asian women have awesome freaking hair. Shiny, black and beautiful. My hair is poker straight, won’t hold a curl and often has a mind of its own. It also can’t decide on what color it wants to be. It was blonde when I was really, really small. Then it was a mousey brown in early elementary school. Mid-elementary through my late teens it looked like it was chocolate brown until you got me in the light or sun and then I had a really dark auburn color.
Rating: 2 out of 5 stars
With Mother's Day fast approaching! Maggie's Direct is offering my readers a really great deal! You can purchase this Stonewall Kitchen Blueberry Batter Bowl Gift Set pictured above for only $49.95 with FREE shipping! Want to make this deal even sweeter? When you purchase this gift set, you will receive 50% back in Social Bucks! That makes this great set only $25!
"I'll give you a baby" he says kissing me at the side of my head.
Vincent dug into the memory hole, his own sentiments and some events that stick with him from the glory days, a couple of which we used in GT backed with some killer unseen photos including a rare photo shoot which were never released to the public. So with his help, GT was able to yet again bring more ultra-rare photos to the table. Things are no different here either - as we bring you images and sentiments we were unable to use in Glorious Times.
I want to have a crush. I want to eat a cheeseburger deluxe with fries and gravy on the side at 2am at our diner. I want to eat that after a night filled with too much alcohol and too many cigarettes.
Find also in the sound a thought,
Why should I feel so guilty about receiving an expression of love from someone who I care about? Why am I contemplating hiding my gift from my work colleagues instead of proudly showing it off?
Okay! Enough chit chat, TUTORIAL TIME!
For a country which figures so prominently in international headlines, it's strange to realise that so little is known about the Iraqi people and their cuisine.
This is my second attempt at this post the first one the automatic html was acting weird and I deleted a formatting line resulting in text getting printed over anything that followed it in the post so that the image that followed the text had text overtop of the image. UGH. I hate that you can't go back and reinsert something you just deleted while working within the post creating section. Anyway enough of my technology impairments. You just wanna see necked women, well not quite necked this is a PG Rated Blog.
Size: 15x15 cm
Last night, I attended Chef Mike Odette's Brewmaster's Dinner: Pairing Beer With Food. The new Culinary Adventures program located in the old Grindstone Brewery has cooking classes, and this is one I didn't want to miss. This place has one main kitchen/classroom with monitors where you can watch the cooking demo. We listened to Mike give an overview of tips on pairing beer and food while we enjoyed snacking on spicy caramel corn with Tallgrass Ale. We were given recipes and put into groups to each try one recipe together. My group got fondue, but there were so many people crowded around the one stove that people had to take turns. Then we retired to the dining room for the tasting of the food and beer pairings.
Some during courtship and the early years…
Well, they edit. They take an author’s work and turn into the story the writer meant to put down on the page.
young man had suffered for several years from a growth in his body. The growth
Thanks for visiting ReMadeSimple today! Stay tuned for more thrifty finds later next week!
Then, I'm hoping to hit up the Great Japan Beer Festival in Osaka, which takes place over the three-day weekend this month.
This morning, I piled my hair in a knot on the very top of my head, straightened my bangs to hang right in my eyeballs, and put on the longest pair of earrings I own. Every time I move a muscle, the earrings clink. My top knot might be a little too top. The middle-aged businessmen downtown kept looking at me like I'm an alien (not that this is too different from every other day). It could be the top knot. It could be the loud feather earrings. It could be the bangs. But more likely, it's because I'm smiling like a maniac and pretending I'm in a music video (not that this is too different from every other day).
green grass under the trees spangled with the fallen petals.'
The thought of a pearl, carefully guarded at the bottom of the ocean by some gigantic mollusk, unseen and hidden, captures my imagination. But the origins of such a secret treasure are quite different from the oyster’s perspective.
Here's 'Lighting Fires' from the second of those solo albums, 1993's 'Fireboy', which, bizarrely, was also included on the American version of the following year's 'Horsebreaker Star'.
While my dad’s car never looked anything at all like the flashy, polished-to-a-reflective-shine, ivory-colored car on display at the museum, the sight of the running board sent a jolt of memory through my body. I clearly remembered standing on just such a running board many years ago.
These are two dramatically different but very good whiskies. The entire list of K&L exclusive bottlings can be found on the right hand column of the K&L Spirits Blog.
like a honest, gentle river
Truth be told, I don’t even know what the heck a Fava Bean is…. I live in rural Texas…. around here, Pinto Beans rule the roost.
Spike, ever the skeptic, declares to two of Trixie’s fans “If I don’t see her vanquish the Ursa Major, I won’t believe it.” His demonstration is fair, but unwittingly sets the two fans to go and find an Ursa to vanquish. Bringing endangerment on Ponyville for the sake of proof is reprehensible enough; it’s made all the worse by the fact that Trixie is a fraud and is terrified by the impending Ursa.
2010.08.14 Thailand Yala 2 0 A Buddhist man and wife are brutally murdered by Muslim gunmen while riding to their plantation.
“We gorillas are vegetarian, Miss, didn’t they teach you that at school?”
Oh the criticism I got… the picking and questions about what we chose to do with our children (and still choose) …. OY VEY! YES, I’m holding my baby while he naps, YES fine, call it SPOILING if you want. Honestly, at the end of the day, I answer to myself (while looking lovingly at my kids and husband). (I say this sticking my tongue out at those that want to pick at me).
I mentioned a few days ago that today was surgery day for Garrett, and that we probably would have to cancel it. Although he still had a bit of a runny nose this morning and some little coughs, his lungs were "as clear as a bell", and we were able to go ahead with the surgery. It's done!
This one deals with skepticism, a slight topic, but I think rendering it in such strong, evocative colours, puts that skepticism in a much more powerful light than simply being about doubt. As viewers, it's our own emotional associations with red that provides a deeper subtext.
So I began researching food photography. How in the world did people with jobs and families take these gorgeous photos? What was the secret? Surely it HAD to be a secret, one that had skipped right over my head.
I resisted the urge to tell him the obvious, the saddest thing is no longer seeing them every day. I resisted telling the boys about the feeling in the chest that stops your breath, and that a small part of the reason I yelled at them this morning was because I'm angry they have to go away. Today I thought I could write about that feeling here instead. That feeling is not a metaphor, and it's the real reason behind that bullshit expression about a broken heart. I want to plead with somebody for another holiday, today. Please, give us another day together.
Yet I struggle with where I am, where I will be, and where I should be. I've always had lofty ideas for my life and I've always wanted to start early with things like my career. Heck, I've been wanting to be a teacher since I was six (which is 19 years for those of you counting). It's hard for me to take in the fact that I've done everything I need to in order to get to that dream, yet I am still not there. I've taken classes, I've gotten my degrees, I've graduated. I even got my foot in the door at a local school. But lately it all seems to be coming to a sudden stop. I don't know where I will be next Fall, or even where I will be wanted.
A Virginia criminal defense attorney can assist individuals involved in legal incidents as they have expertise in managing such circumstances. Visit Virginia Criminal Lawyer and learn a great deal more about the services offered by a Virginia criminal defense lawyer at http://www.virginia-criminallawyer.com/.
Sadly, the last four weeks have been a bit of a disaster. Within 24 hours of leaving my job, everyone in the Steerforth household succumbed to the horrible Norovirus, which had the one redeeming feature of rapid weight loss.
Still here. Still prego. Due date is Nov. 3rd though the idea of 11/01/11 for the little lady's birthday is intriguing. Regardless, she's calling the shots from here on out so we shall see.
The byplay between Charlie and Tommy is very funny and there’s a tough climax in the funhouse. If you’ve been disappointed in some of the Chan series, give this one a try.
In my opinion, the equal protection argument is a slam dunk- these children are clearly being treated differently then other similarly situated children on the basis of their parent's immigration status... its going to be difficult for Florida to come up with a compelling justification for that which makes logical sense. The federal preemption argument, on the other hand, is a touchy subject. It has been a bumpy road for cases using this claim before, and now more than ever, with so many pending challenges to state statutes regulating immigration in some way, it will be interesting to see how the argument fares. One could suspect this case makes the point clearly, that when states try to regulate immigration they end up doing things that hurt citizens as well as non-citizens.
At this point you can incorporate it into your projects. As for me, I like to take increditape and run it through the glitter. That's why I work in a container that's so much larger than what I need for inking the glitter--to give myself space to pull the tape through.
I used spray adhesive to mount a map I bought at the Museum of Natural History to a piece of foam core. I bought a cheap frame at Bed, Bath and Beyond and popped out the plastic (it didn't have glass) and framed the map. Then I used map pins I bought from Staples to tack all of the places! I absolutely love it!
And oh, how the wild winds drove her.
4. Re-purpose: Paint old or outdated furniture in a fun colour. This bedside table takes on a more custom and whimsical look with a coat of watermelon-pink spray paint. In addition a magnetic board painted with chalkboard paint combined with an unused window box that was buried in the garage now become a fun art station.
"Paul Kemp" (Johnny Deep doing a much better job of Hunter S. Thompson than he did in Fear and Loathing)- Rum Diary (2011)
1 large onion or leek, finely diced
You need a permanent address to send out a Child Protective Services team. You need to get a straight story out of mom or child. It takes more than establishing that a child has been living in a motor vehicle for months, has wasted away and is covered in sores.
“Yes, yeah it is. When I was a kid, it was hardly noticeable.” Great, now I feel self conscious.
Other gift ideas — Gifts for the hard-to-buy-for Dad
-DVR recording priority
Publishers can also learn from what some non-publishers are doing. We have a member of staff currently going through the Edinburgh Business School MBA. The organisation provides a complete course pack (no need to buy books), online learning resources, online tutorial support, weekend crammer courses – and of course the final exam. The customer service experience for the executive student is brilliant.
Not sure how it got in there but I’m glad it did. It’s a real flashback. They don’t write resumes that way any more.
Sift together flour, sugar, cocoa, salt and bicarbonate of soda.
These are the hands that will countless times wipe the tears from your
Selective dumbness in Labour is rife! I will not bore you with all the details of exactly what happened, you can watch the film work when we post it and draw your own conclusions but to give you an idea of just how ignorant these people are, there was a wedding in the church next to us and they didn’t even have enough respect to stop their abuse for the wedding party to enjoy their day, that is until the local police showed up and sent them packing!
Nevertheless, you are blessed. Watching my friends with younger children, and watching their children grow, as well as themselves grow and mature as parents and people has proven such. Reading your status, James, about your mother rocking your daughter to sleep, I attempt as a writer to relate to your happiness but am unable to find such relation or expression. Nothing I’ve experienced can compare to what I envision that feeling like, and still my heart warms to the thought of you staring onward, smiling. I never wanted children until my friends had children. I wish my friends children (maybe their second or third?) will someday be friends with my children. I never thought about being a father until my ex’s were becoming mothers and my best friends were becoming fathers themselves, and really — I honestly I could never think of someday being a father with a hopeful patience and elation until I came to know fathers like you, of my own inner circle, who were able to show me that the transition isn’t about being ready or not (though planning and precautions sure do help), but about stepping up and doing what is right and what is best when the time presents itself. Well, except the first time I heard Will Smith, Just The Two Of Us..but that was like 6th grade, so you know, I still couldn’t really comprehend. Nevertheless, I cannot emphasize that enough.
A few days back, when I brought the large case filled with empty containers back into the house from our garage, in order to pack away our Christmas ornaments, a sudden movement within one of the boxes startled me. A dark small shape jumped into my view, only to disappear deeper into the trunk, small feet scurrying within the case, under all the tinsel and ornament crates, causing me to hold my breath and freeze with surprise. I grabbed the case and carried it quickly outside, far away from Sammy's proximity (the cat). Removing all the empty boxes one by one, I finally reached the bottom of the trunk and the small culprit, that has chewed its contents into pieces. A little mouse stared right back at me, its eyes dark like two onyx buttons, the nose pink and ears drawn back. Crouching in the corner, paralyzed by fear, it stood still long enough for me to get a few snapshots, watching me intensely before vanishing into the shrubs through a small hole in the case.
In this post I'm going to show you a few things you can do with the technique you learned in Part 1 of this series. These photos are imperfectly categorized, but as you read along you should get the idea.
Surprisingly there are 100 lb Yellowfin Tuna now in the Yelapa area, Sailfish all over the place as well… won´t take a bait for love or money. If you want to go there and experience the daily frustration, then have a good time. T his is so strange that I have never seen Yellowfin this large in the bay. So it looks like with a little luck things could be loosening up at least a little.
Well done The Sunday Times ...........
Note: you can use any long grain white, brown or red rice for this dish. If you use a firmer grain rice like brown or red rice I suggest you wash and soak the rice for 30 minutes to help the cooking process.
Easter is here! And it looks like it's going to be a bea-U-tiful day!! I am so excited!
In the interim, I have knitted… rather a lot of things. These have been for the most part presents so I’ve not been able to put them up at the time, but for my own narcissistic purposes (what else is a blog for?) I thought I’d do a retrospective of my work.
This is the project I chose to do with the 'Birthday Girl' collection. I chose to do a split easel card (a first for me):
Commenting, HSE Inspector, Jon Harris said “Mr Gibbons’ death could have been prevented if the work had been planned properly and industry standards, such as providing netting, had been applied. The risks of working at height are well-known and falls through fragile materials are the cause of one in five deaths in the construction industry. Acryflor Ltd had a duty of care to Mr Gibbons not to expose him to risk as far as was reasonably practical. Mr Williams, as a director of Acryflor, shared that duty.“
Wow. I took a much longer break than I intended. I was scared that this would happen. Once I got out of the habit of writing regularly I knew it would be hard for me to jump back in.
Primitives Crash UK
I haven't had too many bargains as I just haven't had the time to seek them out, but here are some that I did get.
What a wonderful WONDERFUL place!
A group of girlfriends and I went to see it on Monday night...we decided to do it in style with Gold class tickets and a glass or two of wine!!! Cant wait for part 2.... I know I am a tragic!
The moon has a beautiful slight crescent light in it
Chapter 6: Adding in Human Workflow
Ver 15. And when it was evening, his disciples came to him, saying, “This is a desert place, and the time is now past; send the multitude away, that they may go into the villages, and buy themselves victuals.”16. But Jesus said unto them, “They need not depart; give ye them to eat.”17. And they say unto him, “We have here but five loaves, and two fishes.”18. He said, “Bring them hither to me.”19. And he commanded the multitude to sit down on the grass, and took the five loaves, and the two fishes, and looking up to heaven, he blessed, and brake, and gave the loaves to his disciples, and the disciples to the multitude.20. And they did all eat, and were filled: and they took up of the fragments that remained twelve baskets full.21. And they that had eaten were about five thousand men, beside women and children.
I am really enjoying the monochrome pattern, although I would never have guessed that it would need more than 2 skeins! See that needle threaded above? That is my last thread left, oh NO! but I have more on the way and hopefully in my mailbox when I get home. :D
The recipe is from a book called ‘Wicked-sweet indulgences’ by the Australian Women’s Weekly
That is that,
Giveaway is open to U.S. addresses only.
Teresa Highsmith (Interim City Attorney)
Didn't have anything t!m used this time, so I improvised. The pine tree stamp is at least a t!m stamp! So this is little black dog playing in the snow at Christmas - or maybe incased in ice, depending on your point of view.
The facial expression of women are much more important than her clothes.
tied around a la Isadora Dunca it adds elegance
I really don't want to end on a depressing note because this was such an incredible site. Instead, I want to share my hope. I hope that there in increased tourism to Bamyan and Afghanistan overall. I hope this is due to increased security and prosperity. I hope you can see the Buddhas yourself.
P.S. I know I am writing something that I am not qualified to talk about and I welcome people who have more kungfu than me to point out any directions or books on film theories in which I can learn from. I am very interested in this shit.
NAPLAN is the National Assessment Program for Literacy and Numeracy. Every year Years 3, 5, 7 and 9 are assessed using national tests in reading, writing, language conventions and numeracy. I agree with these tests in principle. But in practice the process is raising some concerns ...
‘Everyone paid for the violence in a lot of ways . . . It’s a very violent world and, you know, there’s consequences. I think we showed it, and I think we showed the toll it takes on these people.’
SUNFLOWER SEEDS. RYE FLAKES. PUMPKIN SEEDS 3K. BUCKWHEAT. CHICKPEA NOODLES. W-UP LIQUID. WASHING TABLETS (£3/12 PACK).
Empire in Black and Gold is a rousing start to a series that is full of awesome ideas and premises in a tantalizing world of what is to come. I didn't see the end sequence coming, even after all the finale hints were laid out, but man can Tchaikovsky write big beautiful battles. With Empire in Black and Gold debut author Tchaikovsky has created a completely original world never seen in the Fantasy genre prior as he eschews Elves and Goblins for races of people with attributes of insects. I give Empire in Black and Gold 8.5 out of 10 hats. Empire in Black and Gold is an awesome open salvo to a series I'll be devouring for years to come. This is a world filled with wonders, magic, and mechanics with characters that pull you through every step. The second volume Dragonfly Falling and third Blood of the Mantis are already available in the US with the fourth coming out this September, which caps the first major story arc of the series. So it will be a long haul series, but Tchaikovsky doesn't hold back much as he continues to reveal more about this world to keep you captivated. My one big question is where are my kinden action figures?
'Hmm,' I said, my face blank.
The DPRK has the most powerful and merciless striking means and methods which are unknown to the world and beyond human imagination. (My emphasis)
light fog. I tell ya, nothing is better for the soul, than to get
"In giving freedom to the slave, we assure freedom to the free."
But can we really merge these three art forms, these three forms of not only entertainment but the glue that holds society together. The art forms that drive the evolution of morality and the very fabric of humanity, can the trinity ever become truly one?
The specifics of the surgery fascinate me – Dr. Grant showed me pictures, mid-operation, so I have visuals for all the steps I described above – but it’s also downright terrifying. All told, I’d be under anesthesia for 6 hours – that’s a quarter of a day! In addition to anesthesia risks, there are risks of infection and blood clots. And while it has nothing to do with anything, I realized a few days after the consultation that the incision he’d make is the same incision a velociraptor would make to kill and eat me, according to an early scene in Jurassic Park (“so, you know, try to show a little respect”).
In trying to revise certain aspects (mostly, the costumes) of Newar Charya Nrtya, I have noticed the same principle applies for the dance that works when observing and learning from Buddhist art.
This weeks recipe called for a six cup bundt + two cupcakes. Not having a six cup bundt to hand, I took the option of increasing two cupcakes to twelve cupcakes. I am not sure if English cupcakes are smaller than US cupcakes, but this mix definitely could have made at least 16 cupcakes and perhaps even 18. As I type that, I marvel at my own dogged adherence to the recipe. Actually, maybe it was less dogged adherence and more laziness about getting out the other cupcake pan... As you can see these cupcakes overflowed alot, yet they finished off quite flat. The crumb was fine - not spectacular, but pretty good, and as Mendy's little ones said, they smile at you! Who can resist a smiling cake?
The County Treasurer selects a primary depository bank, maintains records of all the deposits and withdrawals, and reconciles all bank statements. The County Finance Committee, comprised of the County Treasurer, County Auditor, and Chair of the Board of County Commissioners, oversees the investment of public funds. The majority of depositors include property taxpayers, junior taxing districts, and County departments. All monies are deposited in a qualified financial institution. I wonder what the financial institution is in Alpena?
Despite the global reach of the brand, the BMW customer is motivated by the same core desires and values.
Thank you everyone who has chosen love for me and giving me examples of what that looks like,
It's going as expected. My shoulder gets tired and a bit achy, but given that I have the strength and endurance of a wet noodle, I'm actually doing okay. I do my exercises and stretches. I go see my physiotherapist once a week and let her poke and prod. Today, because my appointment with her was right after my three hour stint at the hospital, she decided to pop a bunch of acupuncture needles in my shoulder and neck to help with the tightness and discomfort. Seven hours later, it actually feels pretty good. Tomorrow might be another story, though. Sometimes the 'beaten up' feeling doesn't arrive until the following day. But that's what ice packs are for.
“I think that he’ll pull it through one more year,” said Grosser.
1/4 cup canola oil
I began that team thinking I hated yellow and came away from it feeling like I really enjoyed painting yellow: always be open to new things.
Banana Pineapple Muffins
Good Health Organic Popcorn: This brand is only available on amazon – but it has the same nutritional profile as popping your own without the added trouble.
The Greenland and Antarctic ice sheets have decreased in mass. Data from NASA’s Gravity Recovery and Climate Experiment show Greenland lost 150 to 250 cubic kilometers (36 to 60 cubic miles) of ice per year between 2002 and 2006, while Antarctica lost about 152 cubic kilometers (36 cubic miles) of ice between 2002 and 2005.
Everyone can GROW the FUCK UP, and quit bickering.
If I am part of your destiny, then someday you will come back to me ...
For many Austinites, the highlight of July Fourth comes at the end of the annual concert on Auditorium Shores when, after a program of Sousa marches, light classical pieces, and John Williams movie music, the Symphony concludes with Tchaikovsky’s “1812 Overture,” accompanied by fireworks, peeling church bells, and howitzers on loan from Camp Mabry, firing across Town Lake. I say to you, there’s something about the smell of gunpowder wafting across the surface of the water that can make even the most dedicated wake-and-bake, Phish-listening, tie-dye, Birkenstocks, and patchouli oil-wearing commie hippie slacker into George S. Patton. The martial spirit has been bred very deeply into the American psyche.
Israeli students at the school objected, however, noting that holding such an event would contradict a halachic ruling stipulated by the Conservative movement in Israel. Rabbi Dr. Einat Ramon, dean of the Schechter Rabbinical Seminary, met with the students and asked that the event also be sensitive to the Israeli Conservative movement’s point of view.
The Great Physician now is near,
When it is within our imagination to conceive the impossible, everything becomes possible.
In response to the photo, Reggie Littlejohn of Women’s Rights Without Frontiers, which opposes China’s one-child policy, confirmed that late-term abortions and infanticide are common means of enforcing China’s one-child population rule.
I said, “I’ve always liked it.”
Mothers who are not Mothers in this Life?
Two full bedrooms and baths. Full kitchen, dining area, living room. Large balcony. Oceanfront.
if the option is available.) So now I'm really wishing I had paid more attention. I probably could have just taken it back for a refund. But I decided to suck up my snobbishness and give it a try.
But to be truly open-minded is to investigate even seemingly rigid, arid and authoritarian practices to discover if there is anything of value within. It’s about coming full-circle and getting past one’s preconceived beliefs about intellectual and spiritual freedom. It’s also about humbly recognizing the limits of the intellect and understanding how past and present influences may inform our preferences, thoughts and opinions.
LABOUR: I love pasties pasty pasty yum yum. Pasty pasty pasty. Pasty pasty pasties. sausage roll.
Very respectfully yours,
Whigfield Saterday night DK
Taken as a comparison done on a features list, the distance between Android and iPhone doesn’t seem that far–and it seems that Android is ahead in some areas. And while that’s true, the experience of using a phone, a device that’s with you all day long, doesn’t boil down to what boxes get checked. The experience is driven by quality and attention to detail, how the device works and how you feel about it. There’s a reason people feel passionately enough about the iPhone to wait hours to get one on the day of a new model’s release. This happens sometimes with Android phones, but less often and at lesser scale.
But if she was trying to get in touch with us the following day, she never did. La Patronne emailed her but we are still waiting for a reply. No apology, no explanation. Nothing.
Or tune in to reality TV,
I am now 30 years old. One day under my belt so of course I'm an expert (my birthday was yesterday). Actually, this isn't really about knowing anything about being 30. I signed in planning to give you another brilliant little list of things about me. Kind of an easy, no brainer birthday post. However, once I opened this page something else came to mind. A list too, but a different one. Recently I've seen or heard about people making lists of things they want to do before they reach the ripe old age that I've just embraced. I never did that, never thought to. I actually never thought much about it ever until right now. I do NOT think 30 is old by any means, although when I was younger it certainly marked a maturity (hopefully) or a next step in life kind of thing. This realization of my apparent lack of extraordinary, quirky (c'mon, some of them usually are) goals has made me reflect on things I might've wanted to do in my "younger years". I guess in a lot of ways I've always felt like I have my whole life to experience the things that I'm interested in and my age would hopefully not hold me back. My grandparents traveled all over the world after they retired, possibly with a fanny pack, so that example is probably a foundation in my thinking this way. Also, when I look at what I have accomplished in the last 30 years it makes me smile and feel like my cup is way more than half full, it's overflowing. Cliche I know, but true. There's nothing extra special on my timeline that would cause someone to be impressed, but to me it's brilliant. Life has not always been exactly what I wanted, in a lot of ways it still isn't, but I have what is important to me so all the other pieces of my dream life puzzle can just remain on the side. Some of those pieces are from wrong puzzles anyway so they won't ever fit. My little family is far from perfect, but they are the tea leaves in my boiling water, the maple syrup on my pancakes, the fresh gooey brownie in my ice cream. Hey, I like to eat and drink tea. They infuse their amazingness and make my life better, so easy and delicious to drink or eat right up. I mean, we all have our days, loads of them, but man I love them. Deep, deep, gut wrenching love. That's what's important, more important than the things I don't have. Plus, I have to say that I have some of the most incredible friends a girl could ask for, hands down, no competition.
The most interesting way that the acceptace of this shift in desireable characteristics are portrayed is seen on tv and movies of men crying, becoming Romeoesque, and even adapting the ultimate form of female identity by dressing in drag. Mrs Doubtfire, Tu Wong Fu: Thanks for Everything Julie Newmar, and the Rock’s sexy legs in pink tights for the movie Tooth Fairy are some of the ways men are identifying their softer side. Ironically, in the movie Tooth Fairy, it took this detour from the character’s brutish masculinity (what is more male than playing hockey and knocking people’s teeth out while getting into random fights) to truly became a good boyfriend, potential husband, and surrogate father to the characters in the movie. Hell it even made his character a better man. There may be a large number of women who definitely approve this shift in the male persona.
So, if the Duke study is correct, here's where we stand 12 years after the introduction of TiVo. DVRs are causing people to miss 1.2% of TV ads. Meanwhile, greater viewership is causing them to watch 21% more TV ads.
It’s also not farfetched that DCF had more than likely been called out on behalf of this little boy. Another mother on trial for killing her child.
Today I'm feeling a multi-colored theme happening:
1.) Life is full of solid examples of evil’s existence. To call it illusory, is to play philosophical games or to live in a dream world that is based upon either your denial or perception. Also, if this god is everything then if we do establish that evil exists, that would mean that evil is a part of this god too.
It was then that I discovered The Container Store this year. I'm enamored, really. I love this place. If you've never been, it's basically a giant warehouse of every storage container imaginable. Unfortuantely, it's also relatively costly, especially for custom installations. So that's why I worked with what I had, bought very affordable, clear-plastic bins and labels. Plus, combined with a sale, and yes, a teacher's coupon, I did it on a tight budget ;)
“If you run away,” said his mother, “I will run after you.
Three hundred years ago, a group of powerful beings arrived in our shores. Known as vampires, drinkers of human blood, their menace quickly spread throughout the land. But unknown to them, a powerful clan also lived in the islands, a group of beings who can transform themselves into powerful wolves – the Taong Lobos. The Taong Lobos were the humans’ protectors and they immediately formed an army to destroy the vampires. The blood drinkers were no match to the Taong Lobos. One by one, they fell. Those who survived were driven into hiding. What followed was peace among the humans and taong lobos, and the memory of the vampires started to fade. But the vampires are only lying in wait – organizing and fortifying their numbers until they are ready. They are holding a secret – a prophecy that foretells of an epic battle between them and the Taong Lobos that will finally decide the one blood that shall rule all. The battle shall be led by a powerful vampire and a powerful taong lobo who are each others nemesis and downfall. The vampires believe they have found their prophesied savior and now they are preparing to come out and start the war. The Taong Lobos have grown complacent, and they know nothing about the prophecy. With the stage set for an epic battle, two individuals, Mateo and Lia, find themselves drawn to each other, unsuspecting that as they grow closer together, they are awakening the powers that are lying dormant in both of them – the same powers that will inevitably tear them apart.
Cheerful conversations
Bob (Stern) and Stu (Frewer) are former best friends whose relationship went sour early in life over a friendly wager. Though decades have passed since the incident, neither man is giving up on the grudge. Imagine Bob's surprise when he discovers his old nemisis Stu is back, has moved into the house across the street, and is taking him on mano y mano (loose translation: How many donkeys should one live nativity scene have?) in a competition to win the town's annual Christmas decorating contest. There is no ornament too flimsy, no filament too thin to keep these two warriors from assaulting each other with laser-like illumination and, finally, merrily melting down the town's electrical systems. But when Stu's son falls in love with Bob's daughter, the two men find exceeding abundantly in life is much more important than exceeding the maximum wattage.
As the train trudges to the last stop, the doors open and the sounds and smells of Coney Island instantly take hold – the roar of the wooden roller coasters, the screams, the aromas of cotton candy and French fries. Down the ramp they go. Surrounding them are the carousel, Wonder Wheel, movie theaters and shooting galleries. Further ahead is Steeplechase Park and towering behind is the park’s centerpiece, the 262-foot tall Parachute Jump. On some days the boys succeed in sneaking into the park late in the day and searching for discarded punch cards, which will allow them access to rides.
For first year Ecology & Evolution (and some other) graduate students, his biometry class was, quite literally, a rite of passage: successful students were inducted in to the “Loyal Order of Normal Deviates”, whose hymn was “Freedom By Degrees”. I was fortunate to be able to take the class as an undergraduate in my senior year (fall 1978). The second edition of Biometry was in the works, and we received the revised text in xerox. As much for his accomplishments as a researcher, he should also be recognized for his accomplishments as a teacher, both in the classroom, and through his book, which I found to be perhaps the most readable self-teaching tool I have ever encountered. I have used it (or it’s shorter version, Introduction to Biostatistics or “Baby Biometry”) for 20 years, and plan to keep using it in future classes. But last week it was my sad duty to tell my class that they are the last to use it while Dr. Sokal was alive.
6. From All Of Us To All Of You - Disney
The task would have been easier on Java or Matlab, but I don't know Java, and I didn't want to install 2GB of Matlab just for this purpose, so I turned to the more pedestrian Excel. From here on it's a bit technical, so you should read on only if you are teaching at a secondary school in Tanzania, suffering from similar forms of inefficiency, or bored.
As a child, I didn’t talk to them as much because I always felt a little scared, a little guilty. I spent most of my middle school and high school out with friends, so that any reflections would be as normal as those of the kids reflected around me. In college too, I was too busy coming and going, bumping into roommates and running in and out of my dorm.
I'm just sayin'I think the CCA needs greater diversity - of opinion, not race, gender, etc. - so my disagreements with Keith over eyewitness ID won't keep me from voting for him in the fall. But that doesn't change the fact that Hampton and the Texas Criminal Defense Lawyers Association were the lone opponents of eyewitness ID reform at the Legislature, not great champions of the idea.
This one that even I could keep up with. Just take a picture of my ort jar and post it every New Moon. Don't even have to have anything added to it month to month. Because I may be Rosanne Connor's lost baby sister, my jar is a Ragu jar, I bought and made spaghetti just to have a jar.
Locally, we are a tourist economy. In talking with local business people, the season was bad. Oh sure, they came, they laid on the beach, but they did not buy. So the gas stations got a bump in sales. Stores not so much. And now they are gone. So we get to go back to sleep. Stores trying to figure out if they hold on until next year.
There was a lull in the battle as the retreated guerillas and any ambushers who had not sprung their attack regrouped and the Americans regrouped around Sarah and begun repairs.
Setting aside Machu Picchu, which was, WOW, Cusco was my favorite place in Peru. I loved Cusco so much, in fact, that it’s now one of my absolute favorite cities on the planet, right up there with Paris, Edinburgh, and San Francisco. High praise, for sure.
Mr Burnip, who is 51 and from Hebden Bridge, was looking out from Watbarrow
it threw me into writer's block.......
An honest look at the complexity of finding "the one," and the things one must do to survive along the way. And when dating is hard, it's good to have friends around who are easy. - NBC
Now it’s time
Disc 6 (25:56):
Sometimes it lasts in love but sometimes it hurts instead,
Saaru / rasam is prepared with toor dal and tomatoes. The regular spice mix for rasam is not used. Here the flavor is from the cumin-pepper powder. Also for the regular rasam, the seasoning is prepared with mustard, cumin seeds. As mustard is not used during this time ,only cumin seasoning is used.
The reason for the sharp drop in demand is that the cut is to the tariff homeowners receive for feeding their solar panels excess energy into the national grid. By halving the amount received per unit of electricity supplied the government have effectively doubled the time it will take for the solar panels to be become an economically viable alternative.
While the photographs may be graphic to some readers, it documents the high cost that soldiers paid for what they believed in a country of united states. Bontecou’s photographs, or carte de visites (CDV) were a result of the order by Surgeon General William A. Hammond to document the cases that the surgeons worked on, their treatment, and their outcomes. Many of Bontecou’s photographs helped illustrated the
squad.
Q: What bookish places did you go to?
Last week, I got online and ordered a “temporary” counter-top wine rack, one that could be displayed IN the actual kitchen, in full view of all our guests and visitors…. though we never actually have guests or visitors, so my real motive in wanting a wine rack was just so that I could stare at my future wine adventures as they aged by an extra week or two while sitting out on the counter.
And the last thing. There is one thing about poodles that makes them clear winners as house pets. They don't have fur. They have wool – fleece so fine you could sell to the top Italian knitwear buyers at auction for ten thousand cents a kilo, under the guise of superfine Merino. Well, maybe not Ted's, but a fleece from one of those elegantly manicured uppity poodles with sissy pink bows and coloured claws.
Born in Chicago in 1892, he died unheralded in 1973. Tabloid writers would describe his life as “tragic”.
Except for the dark blue cardstock, this card is entirely digital papers and paper-piecing! I used Summertime Designs' Fathers and Fedoras Kit and Vintage Oreos. She has some fabulous, fabulous kits... and free! I used several prints from the Fathers kit for the layers and for my bear's little hat and coat. I still don't like my fur coloring yet, so I used the lighter and darker damask papers in her Oreos set, tweaked just a bit for color temperature in Word, for the bear's fur and the Hedgehog's prickles.
“Which also said, Ye men of Galilee, why stand ye gazing up into heaven? This same Jesus, which is taken up from you into heaven, shall so come in like manner as yet have seen him go into heaven. Then returned they unto Jerusalem from the Mount called Olivet which is from Jerusalem a Sabbath day’s journey.”
7. Trust... Maybe it's just the folk in my local area, but to me, a hardened Londoner (well, not really, I was from West Hampstead) the sight of people leaving $1000 prams and a collection of children's bikes on their porches overnight makes me feel like we're on Walton's Mountain. Where are all the thieves? People leave prams outside coffee shops, too - I mean, how long do you think a Bugaboo parked outside Starbucks in North London would last? Lovely, crazy, trusting Melbournians, I hope you don't think me rude for leaving nothing on my porch, but I come from a land where people would steal the milk from your doorstep.
When you decide a Business Class flight the payment are at once missing perceptible. Long-haul worldwide running missing motivation regularly consists of lie-flat seating, while even on shorter journeys unsurpassed travelers detriment starting notably more legroom. And as far as in-flight service is concerned, you can expect restaurant-quality meals, unrestrained at no cost hard drinks and hurtful edge back seat distraction system.
8. At The Edge Of The World 03:59
Aside from that we have discussed a field trip to the Brooklyn Brewery with Greg and Deirdre for yummy beer, a stop at the German beer garden, dinner with Brian’s aunt and uncle to celebrate his aunt’s birthday and whatever else comes our way. Lots of fun to be had and things to do!
When you take your last demit to that Great Lodge in the sky where St. Peter is the Tyler, don’t make him ask you why you’re there to gain admittance for the remnant of your soul; instead you should be listed already on the roll.
So much architecture is about trying to repel the undesirable: benches you can’t sleep on, doorways you can’t sit in. You need those dark, dirty corners that allow for the unexpected. You need uncertain gaps that let not necessarily just young people, but anyone re-energise. If everything’s planned you are in the hands of the planners.
I was 132 pounds before I got pregnant..and I'm the same now! Cheers!!!!
I just thought I'd show you my final sample that I did for the Polka Doodles Create & Craft Show at the weekend. It is of course an exploding box.
He said it was ‘a bit emotional’ to see his first UK exhibition because his work has been so inextricably linked to his personal life.
Red flag #4: Stealth clients. A spot check on client names not only turns up no sign of published or about-to-be-published books, but in some cases turns up no sign of clients. Hint to fake agents: if you're going to invent your clients, calling them things like Omi Wonn, Mariangela Thunder, and Tom Hooberg is not the best idea. For heaven's sake give them common names, so a websearch won't make it so obvious that they're bogus.
The problem is that there is no magic formula for selling. There are far too many variables to say with certainty "if you do so and so you'll sell X amount." Now granted, my mom was right and "If you don't tell people, they won't know." And Dennis is correct that the other writers are doing social media, you bet. So no promotion is a mistake. Social media is a wonderful tool. But there's no way to tell if being on Google+ will sell more books or less than being on Facebook. Or if being on both will sell more of your title.
From the summary of facts, this sounds like an action which the litigant in person had little prospect of winning and which he might have been well advised not to commence.
Congrats and don't forget to grab your badges as well.
John Adams, the second President of the United States of America, just happened to be the first President to sign a healthcare bill that mimics “socialized healthcare.” You will find many articles written by pro-socialized health care authors and politicians with the argument that our forefathers would want a similar bill in these new times as evidenced by that first Bill on the matter. My advice to you- “buyer beware.”
Photo editor on device
It was then I realized that, as good as my intentions and my mission were, much of what had been going on was a self-justification project. Justification by ministry was creeping into the heart of my religion. Ministerial opportunities and success were becoming the source of my identity and my righteousness before God, while Christ was being cheapened.
That piece of wood hanging down in my porch fell down because there was nothing for it to hold on to. The board it was attached to had rotted away. Rotting often starts on the inside and works its way out. My heart is like that. I had held in all that had upset me instead of laying it all before the Lord. Because I didn’t bring my heart before the Lord, unforgiveness crept in. It grew and took over causing my actions and attitudes to be tainted.
Or, are the US public cultivars as good or better as the European originals, but some crafties insist on using select German and Czech varieties because of the mystique thing – you know, to truly appreciate beer, you have to wear lederhosen, swill from a tankard the size of a mail box, and polka to that good old oompah beat.
Me: Because he's already married to me.
But despite this shift, one of the major driving forces behind the practice of divorce started within the women’s rights movement. Not studying much of the topic I never knew what few rights women had in marriage in the late 1800′s and how hard we worked to achieve these basic rights such as child custody and the right to have our own property, wages, or even our own bodies.
Donald Fagen - piano, electric piano, synthesizer, vocals
1And after these things I saw another angel come down from heaven, having great power; and the earth was lightened with his glory.
Once inside, she was strapped down and given an
While horse & hero fell,
She invited me to sit down at a small circular table and seated herself opposite me. I got straight to the point.
One I will mention was the beef and potato, a sort of reinventing of traditional French steak frites. The beef is rare, which I like, but a little fatty, but the potato is shaved into impossible thin wafer “chips” that are more like flakes. It was the most impressive of all the courses and one that really had a point of view and something to say about French food.
an hour of your time..and this is one of my absolute
Imagine. You. Because.
A contract is not a gift, it is a professional agreement and you should enter into it as a professional, not as a grateful wannabe-writer. Just as no writer has an automatic right to have their book published (most books written or proposed are crap), so no publisher has the right to dictate unfair terms and have you agree to them. Don't sign away electronic rights for 2% (or nothing); don't agree to do endless publicity for nothing for a flat-fee book; don't agree to revise a flat-fee book as necessary for future editions without another fee. In short, don't agree to be exploited or cheated.
With all that’s been going on, I’m also using this to apologize publicly to everyone who shares this body. Vicki has gotten little bits and pieces here and there, and Talyn has been helping me out, and Ludovic has been giving me background music (thank goodness, I can’t be involved in physical activity without music, I just can’t), but I’ve been hogging the body.
Still, I set up an appointment for today with a therapist I had worked with in the past. I realized that the next time I spoke with my friend, I didn’t want to lay my stuff on him as he had done with me.
I had simply asked for verifiable proof that my correspondent was in fact a real, identifiable human. Instead, I got a sputtering, defensive response that offered zero proof and ended on that menacing note. Given the huge percentage of the population that is swilling cheap booze from the supermarket and popping fistfuls of pills from the corner drugstore, it's a wonder that there's anyone left who's even lucid enough to compose a semi-coherent insult or threat.
This is a cook book from Trisha Yearwood. I think she is an country singer (I am sorry but I am not sure about who she is)
A few weeks back, while she and the Da' were at a street fair, they came across a vendor selling what were described to me as "these fabulous chairs that float and take away your back pain altogether!" She was most serious when she told me that all she needed to do was sit in the chair for about ten minutes at a pop, and her lower back pain melted away. "Of course," she said, "it takes a bit of getting used to, but it really does help. It's a suspension-y sort of thing -- you just hang there kid of weightless...your dad put it up in the basement. He attached it to one of the joists, and I can sit in it and watch my shows!"
I watched your theology take another man
Label: Heartthrob
The Gisele Grey Suede Ballet Flat. Ok, so I'm a huge fan of anything animal print and these grey leopard print with the fuchsia lining is calling my name! It's a must have for the summer, I can see myself wearing these lovelies out on date night or to work to spice things up with my daily wardrobe!
“Filling out your profile, that’s a behavior LinkedIn wants to motivate. The progress bar is this total insight to your progress as a user,” says game designer Gabe Smedresman, who designed the Facebook game Crazy Boat, and who is working on a social-interaction app called Meet Gatsby. “That taps an innate human desire to complete things, and not leave things undone. That’s what games do—they are systems that give people pleasure.”
Friday the 16th – The Spaghetti Western Orchestra @ Symphony Hall, Birmingham – Doing Morricone and such. (Edit: just realised that this is part of the Flatpack Festival, as above).
For a Beauty and the Beast story told from the perspective of the beast, I would have hoped for a little more in the way of low self-esteem based on what he thought, rather than because of what others think, but overall, Beastly is a pretty good story. With a strong message of its what’s on the inside that counts, and an uplifting ending, Beastly could open the eyes of those who are short sighted.
In our picture book, THE MAGIC TRAIN, Jorgen and his donut-loving daddy shrink to become the engineer and brakeman of the Magic Train. They zoom, clank, puff, and roar upstairs, downstairs, through all the bedrooms, and even into the garage. They encounter sleeping dolls, an erupting volcano, delicious crumbs in the kitchen, and a problem that can only be solved with a chocolate donut.
But not all fats are good for you; some, in the wrong amounts, can seriously damage your health.
Feet: Slink – Women’s Natural Barefeet (mesh rigged)
Dumped and spread 11 truckloads of top soil the front yard..
For a long time I have favoured a Sparkling Shiraz with Indian Curry because the spicy flavours of the wine meet the flavours of the food, while it is also cold and refreshing.
Repeat the following conversation 10 times to the same person: “Do you hear that?
Falcon just finished memorizing The Road Not Taken by Robert Frost. This makes his third poem he has memorized this school year.
In the flickering neon lit concrete labyrinth of the cities I sometimes appear as a bartender, other times I have taken the form of a driver, or a cleaner, or a lowly musician. Sometimes I am able to be seen in my preferred form: wearing tanned hides, bird feathers and rabbit skulls with ice-age style drum accessories.
May 21 - May 23 - George & Carol
The main issue with this is that there's no real "local" brewery in Indiana. No, no one has stepped up and opened a small brewery or brewpub in this college town. I personally think it would do well, but not having a solid financial background, nor a product good enough to put forth, this task can't rest on my shoulders. So with no truly local beer available, what's the next step in "Keepin' it Local"? Well, first is patronizing local bars, bottle shops, and distributors. This is where a lot of my focus will be. Secondly is expanding "local" to "regional". Now we're getting somewhere. Within a two-hour drive, there are no less than 11 breweries and brewpubs, many of which make some great brews. I'll be hitting on these, too.
Cream painted metal &wonderfully vintage in style.
I've also never done a Combination 10 division before, either (shhhhh...I think I was supposed to have done one as a prerequisite, but I'd done a C8, so I thought I'd wing it).
Then throw the leeks on top
I’m at the end of my rope, here. I’m so fucking sad about everything. I hate that everything has happened to us at once, I hate that any of this has happened at all. I hate that I have to be alone with BB and my grief for almost a month. I hate that I have to leave my network of friends who have become my family. I hate that my cat died. I hate that our trip to Disney World died. And I fucking hate that my brother died. This is so wrong. It’s so unfair. It’s so much more to deal with than I can handle.
I would like to close today with a greeting, because today’s sermon, if given its strongest reading, was about changing the way we meet people, it was about conferring the greatest benefit of the doubt to all of our brothers and sisters, without any reason to do so but faith, without any reason but love.
This mystery of the central relationship in Certified Copy is the culmination of a seemingly minor but absolutely central theme in Kiarostami's work: the incessant wandering, drifting, or searching of his characters, often by foot or in a car. Foregrounding this seemingly innocuous activity to such a great extent, his films require that we interpret this aspect as a consistent, central motif. These wanderings can take on a political edge (as in the Koker trilogy) and they can even hint at a poetic, almost mystical religiosity, as in The Wind Will Carry Us. Rootlessness reaches its peak in Certified Copy, directed by an Iranian, filmed in Italy and co-starring a British non-actor and a French actress.
R.S.V.P. My Crepe Suzette
With the partner
-ACAI
He said studies show how a more educated populous generally has less crime.
Physical education shall be an essential pillar in building society; and the state shall encourage it to prepare a generation which is physically, morally and intellectually fit.
The A to Z Challenge has taught me that being a writer is work, hard work.
Yesterday, I had lunch in a restaurant that was packed with people. I noticed that at the beginning of the meal, the waitress was enthusiastic and happy to wait on us. We were sitting on the outside porch overlooking the water. In this area, people come and go as they please and their seating is not controlled by the hostess assigning tables. Obviously, most of the patrons wanted to be on the porch this warm sunny afternoon because her station soon filled to capacity and beyond. As the people piled into the area, she became overwhelmed, the orders became more complicated and her thrilled excitement slowly seeped away.
"The reason for handling this sensitive matter in this manner is that it involves the preservation of life and has an impact on peoples' culture, behaviour and social norms. The city does not take such issues lightly," he said. -- Fiona McLeod
But traffic's different here. Simply not slow enough to play sudoku, put on makeup, tweeze my eyebrows (I don't really, just putting it out there as a potential), work out what the hell that black stuff underneath my nail is and why can't I wash it off, come up with seven different ways of wearing my faux-hawk with the help of multiple mirrors available in my car, or make up stories of people who have those stupid 'baby on board' suction-cup thingies on the rear window in which (the stories that is) they always have dark family secrets or possibly an extra toe/finger/other magnificent appendage (never claimed to have a normal imagination).
Kevin McCullough at Townhall thinks so. He compares the energy and enthusiasm of the Tea Parties going into the 2010 Congressional elections with the apparent willingness of Tea Partiers (at least the ones he knows) to accept non-conservative Mitt Romney as the Presidential candidate.
It was a soggy boot sale on Sunday. I blame my mother for being the jinx, she asked to tag along on my boot sale trip and I was more than happy to have the company, although I did find it harder to ear-wig the conversations around me with my mum chatting away. It also meant that I really had to look at those stalls I see week in and week out that I rush past....still nothing to be had on the them. We were the second row in when the heavens opened. Out came the tarpaulin to cover stalls and clothes were hastily thrown in the back of cars but I still picked up a couple of bits:
1/8 teaspoon cayenne pepper
She emptied half a dozen puzzles and bucket of peg board pegs onto the floor.
‘Your insurance. As a family member.’
Things are good overall, especially given that today is only our seventh day living in an entirely new city. My job is awesome, I just wish I had a voice and didn't feel like crap. JP's transition is going well, I just wish he wasn't working till midnight every night (as does he). Landon is doing fabulous in the new school, but has managed to get himself sent to his room every night we've been home. Claire is doing slightly less awesome with the new school transition, but is absurdly adorable in the evenings. The house is a mess, but will look great in a few weeks and I will force myself to deal with it until then. On the upside, we closed on the sale of our Austin house today (we think- funds get transferred tomorrow).
His portly mother wipes her eyes and strokes his face, "You be careful now...here..." as she snatches the bag from his hand, "I'll help you settle in."
It's interesting to see how some guy will react to certain cocktails and the glasses they're served in. I had a group of three guys sitting at my bar one night. Guy Number One ordered a specialty cocktail featured on our menu that is served in a martini glass. He took a sip of the cocktail and exclaimed how delicious it was. A satisfied customer. Guy Number Two ordered a beer. Bless him. So easy and fast. Guy Number Three looked at Guy Number One's cocktail in a martini glass and then at Guy Number Three's beer, looked at the menu, looked at me and then asked me if "said specialty cocktail on our menu" was a "girlie" drink? I asked him what about the drink he thought made it "girlie?" Then I asked him what makes any drink gender specific really. If he wanted to try the drink, then he should try it. A drink wasn't going to make him anymore of a man or anymore of a woman. He quickly apologized because he thought he had offended me. He didn't offend me. I just thought his question was stupid.
My sweet in-laws are in town this weekend, so we're having my folks over for a little cele'. Also coming...Ellen (sister in-law) and Lucy, BFF Katie, maybe Megan and Emily.
Borovnisa
Low temperatures beating previous high temperature records for the date
So, if you're looking for me anytime soon,
Step 5: The cops get overzealous, Well who can blame them. The judicial system screws them over, the judges wipe their arses on them, the media forgets realistic reporting because only the top 10% and the botton 10% of news is news-worth...if an Ozzie cop even breaks a sweat, they become guilty of brutality.
The weather has been just wonderful here the past week! Beautiful Spring like days, temperatures in the 70's or higher and lots of sunshine! A shower or quick thunderstorm every now and then but that's Spring! And I forgot - lots and lots of green pollen covering everything! Ugh. I have ventured outside in the morning hours but come afternoon when it is at it's worst, I hide inside with my stitching (if possible).
Well, after a pretty rough move and a weird bout of the flu (after not being sick for months), things are finally settling down enough for me to get back to blogging, reading and all sorts of other goodies.
But that was in the Old Days,
Jews have a more particularist notion of morality: Is it good or bad for the jews? If something is good for jews then it is right, otherwise it is wrong. Jews are also well aware that universalist-sounding rhetoric can bamboozle Whites into serving or at least acceding to jewish particularist interests.
Wilt though my advocate be dumb?
Here's another Arab tyrant under siege, feeling isolated and desperate for any political or moral support from any Western figure and I expect Assad to also be very generous with anyone who provides him with this kind of support which he so badly needs.
Melt the margarine in a small saucepan on medium-low heat. Add the rest of the ingredients and stir well. Keep stirring from time to time until it reaches 120 -125 C (248-257 F), about 5 minutes from when it starts bubbling. Pour on a parchment paper and let rest in room temperature until quite firm. Use a pair of scissors to cut the toffee into pieces.
The results now no more show removed file. My dear users were really annoyed with that.
Life is really, really, hard right now and there is so much more going on that I haven't talked about because I can't. My heart is breaking and my feelings are so raw. I cry a lot.
919-272-7168
Inspiration more or less finds me when I least expect it. Something happens in my daily life – - I read a word, sentence or see an action that gives me a book title idea, I hear a TV article about a specific subject that makes me think a book about it would be perfect for kids, I even listen to conversations in stores and at social settings. I just never know. Blogs are also full of ideas that create sparks of inspiration. The “Picture Book Idea Month” on Tara Lazar’s blog is a sensational idea. It makes me stop working on my eternal “must do” list to think, imagine, and dream of picture books. Unfortunately ideas don’t drop out of the sky like falling stars, but they do arrive if I concentrate, sit still and listen.
1 confidential
Before we get down to business I have a family favorite to share with you today. My family loves Mexican food and this is an easy weeknight dinner. The leftovers the next day are even better, and my family is not one for leftovers.
He replied: "I made a statement some months after when I began to remember other parts of the incident which for some reason I couldn't remember because it was too distressing, it was too scary to remember and it was very upsetting."
Right side! Most of the cards were done in Photoshop. This took a long time because I am SLOW at the digital stuff. It was super nice though to just get my photo prints back and be able to trim them and stick them on the page. WORK DONE! I probably won't do this every week, but like I said, since I was stuck on the couch sick all week, it worked!
The GOP (The group this man has close ties with) has led the push for law and order. Demanded more power for the police and insisted that the courts erode protections that had been in places for decades. It is the GOP that pushed for the creation of the Department of Homeland security and the Patriot act and a countless other measures that have all resulted in the police having more power. This has led to more pressure being put on them to do something to address some type of behavior. The end result of all of this is inevitable, heightened enforcement, more traffic stops, and more arrests, leading to pissed off GOP county chairmen busted for DUI who are now seeking revenge.
I have been slowly starting to get back into the swing of creating and just enjoying....Trying not to take on too much so I can use more creativity rather then feeling like I am mass producing... My latest inspiration for charms are some of my favourite books or quotes from my favourite books.... Especially classics from my childhood.....
Pick #4: Yoon Mirae (윤미래)
Yeah, I guess it always is changing, but there’s classics like ‘Loves Of A Blonde’, ‘Antoine And Colette’, ‘Maculin Feminin’. I also like more recent films like ‘This is England’, ‘Dogtooth’ and ‘Attenberg’.
Sun, 2pm: I love the weekends.
Bowie the hero!
Now some do not believe in signs from beyond the grave, like a spiritual presence, but I do. When we lost our angels, I would encounter cool drafts going past me, or if a candle had been lit yet no drafts but that flame would flicker. When our sister lost her fight with cancer and passed away on Christmas Day 2011, I had this urge on Christmas eve, thus the night before she went, to say “Good night Debs, we love you” like as if something inside me knew I wouldn’t get to say goodbye to her and see her alive again after.
But I've saved the worst for last. My all time favorite worst 'cod reggae' song has to be Paul Nicholas and his song 'Reggae Like It Used To Be'. Nicholas was better known on this side of the pond for his hit 'Heaven On The Seventh Floor' which I distinctly remember dancing to at a 6th or 7th grade dance in the late 70's. It wasn't until very recently that I was introduced to his left turn into reggae. Here it is as performed on Top Of The Pops in May 1976. The song actually reached #17 in the charts which doesn't speak kindly to the taste of the British listening public! Luckily, punk and 2-Tone were just months away from washing this type of clap trap off the charts.
1.Zest limes into a bowl. Squeeze in juice from 1 lime, and whisk in fish sauce and sugar.
Dried red chillies – 2, medium size, medium hot, broken into halves
* Bring a dolly or rolling cart
It's a fascinating read, and an example of how anyone's life can be interesting. It had me looking at some unfinished business in my life, too, and asking who I'd visit or track down if I had a year to do it. My story would be a little bit different (Kravitz, after all, is of the AARP generation), but it could be worth looking into in honor of my 30th birthday, which is happening this year, and the cross-country trip I might make after the big day.
So many questions, so few answers.
All ticket holders will also get 10% off all Dredgers Union merchandize!
1 rainbow's
Mr. Tissainayagam�s first interview since he was released, was conducted by the international media watchdog, Reporters Without Borders (RSF).
It's been overwhelming in our little house these past few weeks. If you remember, our boxer, Charlie, was diagnosed with terminal bone cancer a few weeks ago. Since then, he has had a leg amputated, enjoyed a few good days at home and was then re-hospitalized for a severe infection for five days. We finally have our boy home (hopefully for good!) and he seems to be slowly getting back to his old self.
Now, I like to think that not many things would shock me any more but recently, I have found that, I am nowhere close to the end of the “shock” list. Based on what I thought was a careless comment, I discreetly asked a lot of girls if they would like to date/marry a virgin male and 70% said NO! I mean, this is a world where women are called sluts…ridiculed on a daily basis for not being virgins?
I shook my head. "Why doesn't the stamp include delivery?"
When I make a taco pizza, I completely cook the crust before adding any toppings. I abhor melted cheese on my taco pizza, so that is always the very last ingredient I top the pizza with. Speaking of cheese, I prefer to buy organic cheese in chunks and then grate it myself. Once nice result of that is that even though I use the same dry measurement as I would with an already shredded cheese, I really end up using less cheese by weight since when I grate it myself, they are lighter, thinner shreds that tend to curl and aren't as tightly packed as the already shredded stuff.
“Anyway, like I said, we’re potentially working together this time.”
To make things interesting, I'm offering the following prizes (not to mention bragging rights):
The post is tenable from 1 September 2012.
For Brad Jones it represents a great opportunity that he could not have envisaged particularly when he was going through his own personal tragedy last year. It’s unfair to judge Jones on Tuesday’s performance where I’m sure nerves played a part. It promises to be more fraught in that department today and this will be just his second appearance for us. On the positive side cup competitions are full of so called “underdogs”, many of them keepers, who have stepped up to the plate, performed beyond expectations and done their club proud. I wish him the best of luck.
1/3 c pitted kalamata olives, chopped
ATTENTION SENIORS:
The pictures don’t need to remain miniature of course, and you can click to enlarge.
our leave. Yet, somewhere in the midst of the wailing, tinkering landscape,
Willow weeps
We spent a useful afternoon sorting things in the dining room, separating books into piles of Wet and Not-Wet. My husband is determined to be recompensed for every book with buckled pages, whether “usable” or not. I don’t know if that is going to work, what with us having no contents insurance. Nor, of course, do we yet know Upstairs’ attitude to reimbursing us. Lots to worry about.
On Friday, I ended my 2 1/2 year relationship with my old job. We had some drinks and some food, some laughs and some tears, and I walked out. 3 hours later my old supervisor called me to ask where a file was. If he calls again, I will charge him a consultant fee. Breaking up is hard to do.
And psalms of the dead.
Ikebana
Remember that Hans wasn’t declaring his answer aloud, or writing down any unambiguous symbols. He would tap his foot, and again, and again, with a short pause between each time. One way to give an infallibly correct answer to any numerical question, without needing even a primitive understanding of mathematics, would be to start tapping, and somehow work out when you’re supposed to stop. If you have a captive audience eagerly watching your every move, and who do know exactly when you should stop to give the right answer to the problem, this might be possible. If you’ve asked Hans to calculate 3 + 2, your thoughts as you watch him might run along the lines of:
She wanted out
Now I am riding along 400 West, that means four blocks west of the Mormon Temple and on the backside of West High School, with its IB program, the best school in the city. Thus we are seeing the capitol from the west side instead of the normal northern view. The most important thing in the picture is the absolute lack of snow in the foothills. They are ready for summer hiking.
Yes, Abbigail is pushing Marilyn around the playroom in her dolly's stroller.
Oh, but wait. If this is cellular broadband, then don’t you have to sign up for a two-year contract? No, not with this service. It’s pay as you go. There is no contract and no credit check to get turned down. If you decide you don’t want the service anymore, you can quit without having to pay any termination fees.
Compassion and love are skin deep things
The Sierra Club appealed the PSC ruling to the Supreme Court, hoping to derail the $2.7 billion power plant, now under construction in Kemper County’s Liberty community. The environmental group argued the PSC broke the law by failing to lay out its reasoning clearly when it eased the financial terms under which Mississippi Power Co. could build what it calls Plant Ratcliffe.
I love the way it turned out - I got to try some new things with this card. The faux stitching helps the layers look more finished, the glossy accents on the wheel make it look like polished wood, and the patterned paper is from Webster's Pages - I love their papers, but have never had the guts to cut into one till tonight - glad I did!
Monday I was taking the medicine and I think I stayed home. Worked on Tuesday, and about half a day on Wednesday before my appointment with Dr. Gouw. The whole time the fever was still persisting and the cough. Every cough tasted like an infection. Something wasn't good.
then think again, my friend.
3 tablespoons extra-virgin olive oil
I'm not a social creature so i tended to stay behind the camera lens the most of the day.
Oranges and Sardines is full of these small pleasures, little associations that take you places, much like O’Hara’s orange took him where he didn’t think he would go. But the show is also about doubt, about how shaky being an artist can be, how hard for an artist to justify their decisions in rational language or easy diagrams.
"Mom, I just don't know what to do. I don't know what I should do about this."
Here’s the situation this year all the teachers took a pay cut from the school board so after I went to school 6 years to get a degree that I had hoped would make me more money I can no longer afford to pay the student loans I owe for said degree, which just makes me feel pretty worthless sometimes. Don’t get me wrong, most of the kids I teach are really great kids and make me really enjoy what I do, but there are some knuckleheads that make my job very hard. I just try and remind myself that if the “bad kids” are being horrible to me (most of the kids consider me a very nice teacher) they might be struggling with something outside of school and they just take it out on me. This would be a great time for some emotional eating….but that didn’t happen!
I have a friend whose philosophy is that the children have their schooling and their sports and activities and therefore should not help with the house or the meals. I disagree with this view. Children will one day have a place of their own (sometimes it may seem that day will never truly come…) and they need to know how to take care of their things and prepare food. Besides, even with schooling, sports and activities, kids still have some time to contribute to the household, even if it’s mainly on the weekends.
BL Press
So here are my 7 top Russian books to read. I could make it 10 but why would I if there are 7.
Color Name/Number: Blue Water
I have daffodils (in a vase, not to eat. Like I say, Tom isn’t here this year), and French toast with fresh strawberries and blueberries, plus orange juice and coffee in a cafetiere.
The third minor event of my morning was a kid wanting a story. "I can't read this," he told me, handing me a storybook, "I don't know the words." Okay; no sweat. I pulled up a chair, and before I knew it, five or six little boys had draped or arranged themselves around me and I was reading the horror that is Babar.
Raising the blind on the bedroom window I saw that the tops of the cars in the close were all covered in frost. Hmm funny I thought, it must be earlier than usual if there is still frost about.
“There are some very knowledgeable engine builders who don’t understand how a single coil spring can be better than a dual conventional spring,” stated Thomas Griffin Head valve spring engineer for COMP Cams.
The only aspect of this that was challenging for me, was the wait time, between steps. I am the gal who wants to have a recipe on the table in a half an hour. One evening, I made the dough and divided it, into two packages. Into the fridge, it went. The next morning, I was raring to go and something came up and I had to ignore that dough that was screaming for attention.
Name! Amen!
I kind of have a love/hate relationship with hosting/entertaining/cooking/baking. I like people. I especially like one on one meaningful conversations. I also like baking and cooking.
Winfrey.
When we got to the LabCorp to have the blood drawn I was disappointed to say the least to be told that we were going to have the same nurse that couldn't hold herself together the week before, but I just tried to take a deep breath and give her another chance. To my amazement Cameron did AMAZING! Not one single tear! It was the exact opposite experience. I couldn't have asked for a smoother appointment. He was a trooper and we were only there for 30 minutes. They got all of the samples they needed to do all of the blood related tests. Thank you Lord! I know that he is the true reason that everything went so well.
The truth is that God is able to take our human efforts at loving and make them grace-filled for others – we are free of the burden of having to do things perfectly.
As I was on my way to Tulsa to attend a Women of faith conference, I came across a Cd in my little red tote bag I had brought my clothes in. It wasn't labeled so I had know idea what it was. I asked a friend to put it in the Cd in the player to see if it was some good music. It didn't play anything so I knew it must have been blank or it might be some pictures. So, when I got home I was curious to see what it was.
Just over a month ago, I sent an email to their customer services dept re wearing my enhancers while flying with them. Given they dont do security issues, the TSA do over here, and they were more than happy for me to wear them, this should be straightforward, anything but!
23. The word “dreamt” is the only common word in the English language that ends in “mt”.
My professor told the story to encourage us to come to him or make it known if the things we are learning about the nature of the text of the Old Testament cause us to doubt, but he added: “If you’re going to lose your faith, do it over something more worthwhile, like the problem of suffering in the world or because people in the church are jerks.”
Round five of Alphabe-Thursday will start immediately. We will not have a break in between rounds like we've done in the past.
Kristen said she got the idea from talking to her friends and other mothers: "As you can imagine, I'm a big proponent of children's consignment sales. I always promote the idea of consignment to friends and other mothers that I meet, and I've been consistently met with the response, 'That sounds like a great idea, but I just don't have the time to get all my items ready for sale'. I started to think about how busy most mothers are, what with caring for their children and families, often working part or full-time, maintaining extracurricular activities and their homes. And what a wonderful notion it is to think about handing one aspect of all that juggling off to someone else to manage - what a relief that would be."
“We were in class, we had nothing to do; we were joking around and we wanted to do something funny,” Jawdat said. “I didn’t think something would happen.”
K: Maybe “easier” isn’t the question so much as: which do you find yourself more drawn to? Do you prefer to write about something like your apprenticeship to Andrew Lytle or your brother’s near death experience or something more like the Katrina piece or Axl Rose piece?
1 stick butter, softened
Nestled on a talcum-white private beach facing the South China Sea, the spectacular island Banyan Tree Bintan offers an unforgettably romantic experience. The only all villa resort on Bintan, we are just 45 minutes by ferry from Singapore. Discover inner peace, tranquillity and rejuvenation in the comfort of one of our 61 beautiful villas set in lush tropical rainforest. Modelled on traditional Balinese architecture, each beautifully decorated villa is raised on stilts, perched on hillsides with stunning views of the bay below, with an exciting tree-top experience.
I am mad at myself for believing those lies all those years, for not seeing things for what they are a WHOLE lot sooner, for not trusting myself when I sensed things were not right.
"My First Puzzles: Dinosaurs" $1.99
The stated demand of the Maoists is a directly elected presidential system; the Nepali Congress has asked for a traditional parliamentary system; and the Communist Party of Nepal (Unified Marxist Leninist) has suggested a system with a directly elected Prime Minister and a constitutional President. The NC’s underlying fear is Mr. Prachanda will win in a direct presidential election, and then become authoritarian. The Maoists, for their part, have said they cannot accept a parliamentary system against which they waged a war. After going through 20 governments in as many years, the Maoist logic in favour of a stable presidential system is appealing to many.
I didnt nap
I'm often confused by people who speak of cities and locations by saying "Down in" or "Up in" and then geographically get the location wrong from where they are at that point in time. I recently had a conversation with someone who lives far north of Scotland and we were just talking weather, when someone else said "We've got snow up in Manchester!" and My mind has to think; where? Because Manchester is south of Scotland. She should say "Down in Manchester". The other person knew she was speaking to northerners (OK, I'm not northern but the person leadin the conversation was), but deferred to "Up in"
in the death of some persons
pour light blue sand over the top of me. it fell down in cold powdery
“I want their presence in New York City too,” Brodsky said. “I think they’ve been great corporate citizens. I think they deserve a fair shake. I don’t think it’s necessarily a thing we ought to do. But I certainly think it ought to be considered. Would you gentlemen get back to us with your considered views on the wisdom of using eminent domain to advance this project?”
To make my scene, I used several images from the Paris Elements for the setting: the sidewalk, the table, the chair, a part of the window and the name. And here is a close up on this gorgeous lady I love and who is available as RUBBER!!!
After leaving Hawaii he took a PhD in economics at Harvard and later became a senior economist with the Kenyan government.
The Ultimate Gift ... Hallmark Channel ... 4 PM
A red river, inhabited
My feeling is that, had even the background of what I already know about the 1940s failures been part of the public domain when I started arguing in 2006 for the replacement of Snatch Land Rovers, it would have been much easier to get the message across that the military was, through neglect and other diverse reasons, allowing their troops to be killed.
Amit Bansal answers, Different industries have different criteria for appraisal in the compensation. Your organization’s HR can give you a better perspective on that.
So we had a long discussion on it and decided - TOGETHER - to put it off for a while until we're in a better place, financially.
sunny in between intermittent beatings." Welcome to our past weekend here in New Orleans. Can't think of anything more appropriate than the tweet above as a description for what the weather was like. More than anything else, the uncertainty of what would happen in the city itself was what had us in a bizarre limbo. Flooding further south of the city and the breach of an "interim levee" at the edge of the Harvey Canal on the west bank of the river were unfortunate events further complicated by how the damages caused will be handled by insurance companies and the Army Corps of Engineers alike. It makes what I'm going to post about pithy and trifling in comparison, but fact of the matter is, a slow-moving system like the one we just had passing close by proved to us, more than anything else, that one of the greater things to fear from these storms could well be our extremely bored selves.
The husband came back on Friday afternoon with a bad fever and it was like having a baby at home. I panic when anyone other than me fall sick and this was no different. Ro goes a bit overboard and acts like a whiny kid being all 'I'm so cold,' and 'touch and see if I have fever (every 5 mins) and has been on the couch snuggled up under the throw watching telly all day. Every evening I ask him, 'are you going to work tomo,' to which he says 'are you crazy.' So its been lunch and dinner non stop for the past 4 days and it has driven me a bit crazy because I haven't done my usual quota of articles. He claims his appetite has gone for a toss and this morning the fever subsided and turned into a cough and cold. Perfect time for soup I thought and decided on the French onion soup which I've seen in so many restaurants and has been curious about. Scouted around for a recipe and decided on Finla's descriptive one with minor changes.
Have I told you who I'd like to share my love forever
Toss ups are Colorado (9), Florida (29), Iowa (6), Missouri (10), Nevada (6), New Hampshire (4), North Carolina (15), Ohio (18), Pennsylvania (20), and Virginia (13).
Her recipe didn’t seem to survive. At least, I haven’t found it yet. I recognized the gist of it, though, in a recipe from a Prohibition-era fundraising cookbook from Addison, Illinois just outside Chicago. The recipe is, simply, Gritz. Its use of steel-cut oats puts it firmly in the Germanic Ohio/Kentucky goetta tradition while its call for pork bellies appeals to modern eaters who have rediscovered this unctuous cut of pork.
Fair enough. I have read a little of the wonders of quantum physics and the butterfly effect, and I agree with all that the report says about them, apart from the link to Astrology. “As above, so below”- a beautifully elegant quote, so expressive, and so completely wrongheaded. I love the acronym Great Organising Dynamic, even if I am not sure I agree, and find the expression attractive- even persuasive, had it been about anything else. The report says I belong to God: many Quakers actually put that into practice, but would disagree that God’s Will is expressed in an astrological chart. It states it is up to me: a Jupiter-Sun conjunct (where they appear close together) means optimism and vitality, but I have to realise them in my own life. Here, I begin to see a value in all this. I read good things about myself, feel better because of it, and then am told to go out and make them true.
Regular Cool Music Central visitors will not be surprised to find The Fall’s latest LP (their 29th to be exact) at the top of our album pile. Consistency and the uncompromising rock'n'roll vision of Mark E. Smith is what sets this band in its many incarnations over the years, apart and above all competition.
I love how you're never truely sure who you can trust. Who is Talbot? Can we trust him, can we not? What's going on with Daniel? That's one thing I wasn't too keen on, Daniel doesn't get as much page time in this book, but you can forgive it for the story. Other characters crop up, some minor, some major, but you're never completely sure who is genuine. It's not as frustrating as it sounds, it's quite fun trying to work things out and piecing the puzzle together as more things are discovered. I loved it!
For this image I used pinks for my shadows. I actually used the same three rv04, rv06 and rv09 for the dress, the cape, the socks, the shoes, the basket and the hair. Although, the way in which the pinks mixed with the under color they're shading really changes the way that they look. Granted, this effect isn't really grounded in realism. But often artists choose emotion of realism. And I like the way that pink feels as a shadow. What I really enjoy, visually, is playing with the expectation of shadow--we often think of shadows as dark or cool. But using a vibrant pink sets that expectation on its head and provides for a lot of visual interest.
A retired science teacher and a lifelong Brooklynite, Schweiger has served as borough historian since 2002. He became interested in Brooklyn history after he and his wife moved to Victorian Flatbush as newlyweds back in 1969. He was taken with the beautiful homes and started looking into the history of the area and collecting old postcards and photos of street scenes. He now has more than 3,000 slides of Brooklyn and a substantial library of books.
Some of the following story may be embellished just a bit.
EQXRU Blog (eqxrublog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
The bench subsequently gave the provincial government 24 hours to submit the complete details of missing persons.
As you are slowly succumbing to exhaustion, your mind begins to wander. You can't see that a huge snapping turtle is about to lunge in front of your vehicle!
And on it went for 15 or 20 minutes.
December 18 - Vaclav Havel, Czech president (1989-2003), 75
Last week Zach was drawing a picture and asked me if Yasminah had feet. This may sound like an odd question to most, however we only had a few photos of Yasminah and none of them included her feet.
“I will take away the stony heart out of your flesh, and I will give you a heart of flesh.” Ezekiel 36:26
“You’re no better than these people! You would rather exterminate yourselves and others just for the sake of winning! You’re no better than Mother or her minions! I can’t believe I was such a fool to believe what Tanner said about the human race wanting to preserve life instead of snuffing it out of existence!”
Confess our sins, and seek forgiveness.
After that I was bouncing away on my birthing ball watching "The Colbert Report" with Marc.
query for Janet Reid "Query Shark: yes I read all the archives";
Paladin Persecution by Lam McGra. This article, which could (and probably should) be taken somewhat tongue-in-cheek, nevertheless delivers a very usable set of suggestions for how to DM paladins in your D&D game. It offers many ideas for how to keep paladins "in line," adhering to their strict moral code and discussing how to penalize them if they stray too far from Lawful Goodness. I do not even allow paladins in my own Labyrinth Lord game, but I am in agreement with the thrust of this article and can imagine it being delightfully deployable by DMs who allow paladin PCs.
It's my birthday tomorrow, and when Mr.4444 asked if I'd like to go out to eat tonight to celebrate or have him cook something for me, I knew exactly what I wanted.
Police responded to a home in Live Oak when the residents called to report suspicious activity in their yard. When they got to the house, the caller told them someone had been living in a camper in their yard without their permission.
P.S. If you're in Sydney and you're interested in seeing my crafty jewellery in real life, please get in touch. Keep in mind that I also make other great market-stall gift items like hairclips, badges, magnets etc as well as the pendants, rings and earrings, and as always I am happy to custom-make and gift-box any items for you.
The actual work I do at the conference here is simple: I'm the nut-catcher. While the Texans -- and our Irish-based UK rep and our Tübingen-based European rep -- run around having meetings with people who will be attending SXSW, in particular export associations of European countries who are interested in setting up showcases and trade-show stands, I keep track of where they are ("He said he was headed to Finland" -- meaning the Finnish stand, not, like, the actual country) and talk to people who drop by, most of whom are blissfully unaware of what we do or who we are. It's my job to interrupt their carefully-rehearsed sales-job for their band, event, service, or whatever and steer them into discussing whether SXSW has any value for them. It's also my job to make sure they leave a business card -- most of them have business cards, although I continue to be amazed by people who'd go to an event like this armed only with a stack of self-produced CDs -- because it's not my job to decide whether what they're pushing is of any value to SXSW or not.
We can't go under it.
Although I did not shoot this deer, I would have if giving the opportunity. I did see this deer while hunting for about 1/4 of a second as it jumped over the hillside never to be seen again. I knew it was in the area because of these game cam photos I had of it. So laugh if you want but here it is. I do think he is in the running for smallest trophy. P.S In the area of Washington i live in there is no point minimum for whitetails just as long as it has an antler.
Roll on Autumn, I'm ready for you!
Brauerei C. & A. Veltins GmbH & Co. Veltins Pilsner
Let’s add a last interesting thought. Remember the people out there, who have accurately, multiple times, known what future events will hold? You may even know a person who has done as such, or been one yourself…
Mostly because society's mainstream parenting standards don't see "crying" and tantrums as a normal process. Plus, you got to admit that having a screaming child around you is stressful when you have that mindset.
With that he nodded to both men and headed off quickly towards the rectory leaving the two bewildered brothers standing there.
This sort of conquest is all but impossible for Muslims to accomplish in the modern West. Hence the emphasis on restraint, as articulated by Tariq Ramadan and other “moderates”. According to this strategy, Muslims in the West need only be patient, and continue sucking up the wealth of the welfare state whilst reproducing at their customary rate. Eventually the infidels of the West will attrit themselves into a minority, and at that point Islam may assume political control without resorting to any significant violence.
Remove pan and place on wire rack. Let sit 15 minutes, then remove cups from tin to cool completely. Once cooled, microwave 3/4 of chopped chocolate in 15-second intervals, stirring after each, until just melted & smooth. Then add remaining 1/4 of chocolate and stir until completely melted.
Over the years, and especially since I've become a mom myself, I've had moments where I thought, JEEZ I wish I could tell her or ask her about blah blah blah. It's usually nothing big or existential, but it's the stuff that you really can only talk about with your mom. You know what I mean. So today I'm going to break it down. If I had One More Day, these are the topics that I'd be sure to bring up.
doing such deeds for those who wait for him.
Haircuts Finally!
limit the vote, confuse the voters, force a public vote, and only operate
Bubble Bobble DoubleShotBubble Bobble Double Shot
I balked. “Are you insane? There is glass over there. Besides, it’s too damned hot.” My eyes narrowed at him. “I don’t want another stupid sunburn.”
They are perfect for scrapping all the memories of that once in a lifetime trip! But don't worry, even though there are plenty of European inspired elements, you don't need to be an actual 'world traveler' to find plenty of reasons why you need these kits in your stash! Use them to scrap a road trip, your bucket list, Epcot World Showcase, your vintage and heritage photos, or even the adventure of
When I used to think of the acronym POA, I always associated it with "piece of ass", which is what I've affectionately called Scott for years. Now when I here the acronym, I think "uggghhhh!!!..."
Most people don’t realize that about 90% of the criminal cases in our country are disposed of by plea bargains. A plea bargain is when the defendant pleads guilty to a crime, frequently in exchange for a lighter penalty.
Out-of-focus runway edge and end identifier lights appear... Gimme some wipers please. The co-pilot reaches overhead and turns the wipers to HI. The blades sling water furiously and noisily, clearing the Plexiglas for a brief moment between wipes, but it is enough. I can see long wind creases on the wet runway; a perfect crosswind indicator. No fancy captain Dave techniques this morning... I am going to plant the mains firmly.
01. Sight of All Light
8. For education to be preparation for successful life, affluent, fulfilled life, it has to be Vedic education. Children in this education will rule the world. Their territory will be Brahm–aham brahmasmi. The education of Vedic University will do justice to the total field of knowledge.
“Well…there’s a red rectangle around the table…”
My Favourite Book: always hard, but would have to be JRR Tolkien's Lord of the Rings. I know, I know...but it IS.
All of the delegates are in total silence, but the room is still abuzz with speeches, as it is all done telephathically. It's like tuning in to a radio with lots of stations going on at the same time. The trouble is, my mind is tuned to another station outside.
She married a man
There's a new restaurant at the Nashville Farmers' Market and we think they'll be doing some big business. Bella Nashville pizza had a soft opening on Sunday night. They're serving a modest menu to begin with, but everything is handcrafted and well considered, right down to the house made sodas and yerba mate tea.
it is the first commandment for a graphic designer - you must have a blog to catalog your thoughts, show your inspirations, and post updates of your work (which you are too busy to put on your website.)
Update: Oh, my gosh, do I miss feeling her move. Is that weird? Sometimes when she's wrapped up tightly in a swaddle blanket she'll make a movement with her hands or feet that I recognize so strongly it makes my heart flutter. I had phantom movements for a week or so after delivery (very common) and would get excited to feel her little hands or feet, only to remember that I could ACTUALLY for REAL feel her hands and feet right next to me in bed. Even so, it's still bittersweet.
When we were together
Meanwhile put the 75 ml olive oil in a small saucepan with the sliced garlic & chillies. Cook them over a medium heat until the garlic just starts to turn golden brown. Don’t let it burn. Remove from the heat and pour the hot oil over the bowl of hot broccoli & beans and toss together well. Check seasoning.
I thought this whole thing was totally ironic as people were handing out information on an amendment that will take freedoms away from people, the people themselves were stopped from their right to talk in a public space. I have to say here that the police did say that the group could go to each end of the greenway and hand out their information, but opted to wait for a formal answer and for the media to show up. The only media that showed up was Joanne Spataro a contributing writer for The Charlotte Observer and Creative Loafing. The formal information from the event staff never came.
1 teaspoon instant yeast
I just needed to put it out there, like so many before me.
We have all seen common people protesting in the streets of different countries and we heard many condemnations from governments but as far as I know, not a single Muslim government took any action, except for one…Iraq's!
After reading through the Haruhi light novels, there is one character who has yet to be animated who has jumped up onto my favorite characters list. Since my list is for characters who have actually appeared in an anime, I can’t rank her yet so this is an “extra” analysis of her character. Let’s just say that there’ll be some competition at the top of the list (not from Koizumi though). Introduced in the ninth novel of the franchise, The Dissociation of Haruhi Suzumiya, this character won over many on both sides of the Pacific and was the most anticipated character in the new novels. I’m running out of non-spoilerish things to say, so here is a post about the girl who’s on the cover of The Astonishment of Haruhi Suzumiya (Final)!
Question of Reality TV:
I haven't written any posts since then and wasn't trying to exclude anyone.
Definition: stubbornly continuing on, despite opposition, difficulty, or danger
So where does this take us? The Bonds case shows how important the questions asked are before a person can face charges for perjury or similar matters.
2. Identify Freedom-Fighters, especially Palestinians, as Terrorists. As the old proverb goes, “give the dog a bad name…” The act is designed to directly serve the state of Israel’s purpose, justifying acts of genocide against the Palestinians “terrorists.” That’s why “Osama” calls Palestinians his “brothers.”
Perhaps your marriage hasn't been touched by pornography, and if so, that's wonderful. But I still encourage you to read on, because porn is so prevalent, and we have to understand it just to help our husbands and sons, as well as our friends who are going through this trauma.
The mission of Sierra Gorda Ecotours is to facilitate the introduction of tourists to the natural and cultural richness of the Sierra Gorda Biosphere Reserve. Through tourist services they promote learning, observation and participation in the conservation of the region.
I binged last night because I got in a screaming match with my dad and made him cry. I just didn’t know what to do, so I binged. bulimic/no control/fat/insecure.
So, come on, America. You know in your hearts that I’m the best choice. Your brains might disagree, but those guys are dicks anyway. Plus, I’m from Pennsylvania, just like Rick, Ron, and Newt. So… I guess that means I’ll lose to Romney?
And the winner of this character is...
The thing is, throughout the writing of Diary of Bedlam, I’ve met a whole lot of aspiring authors just like me who are now published. And let’s not forget that agents are out there actively looking for us—they need us as much as we need them. Yeah, I know it doesn’t always feel that way but it’s true. Just because the numbers err in their favor doesn’t mean they aren’t genuinely interested in finding their next big client.
Cable Car
a scent of pebble
A few minutes later the phone rang. Seriously, it could not have been 20 minutes. My next door neighbours (and members of my church at Wilpshire) were on the phone. ‘Are you missing your pussy cat? He’s upstairs under our bed.’ It was such a moment of joy that I could hardly believe it! I grabbed Jess’s food and headed next door for what had to be the strangest pastoral call I ever had. By the time I got there, Jess had raced up to the attic, but hearing my voice and rattling his food bowl he came to me. I scooped him up and hugged him. As cats always are, he was vastly underwhelmed by the occasion and oblivious to the trouble he caused us.
Ok so onto this week and our challenge is a recipe – it’s …
Seeks to revert,
You’ll make your real friends,
If I hadn't used those stripes for these pockets I wouldn't have had to make a second trip. You could argue if I hadn't bleached it in the first place I wouldn't have needed extra fabric. But then I would argue that they shouldn't have sold me fabric with arbitrary marks on it. Sooooo....yeah.
What it is: A collection of short stories mostly revolving around lonely Chinese characters who are grasping at happier future, but are grounded in the bleak realities of everyday life.
Afflictions do not spring out of the dust--nor
And really, really creepy.
But it is constant. For me, as a homeschooling mommy, I am always (always) always (always) with my 3 blessings. Oldest, Middleson, and Babyboy accompany me to the grocery store, bank, dentist (try getting 4 cavities filled with 3 kids running around the dentist's office), gym, library, doctor (no details here), and everywhere. There is no such thing as "time alone" or a quick in-out trip. It is 3 coats on, 6 shoes on, buckled in, unbuckled, in, out, buckle back in, arrive home, shoes off, coats off, hands washed.
What’s also noticeable about these figures in comparison with the current state of academic publishing, is the complete absence of submissions from China, Korea, and Thailand; countries which anyone involved in academic publishing today will be able to tell you are currently engaged in fervent efforts to increase their publishing in English.
(2) There isn’t much streaming.
Here are some I thought of (with a little help from my Twitter friends). I haven't read them all but I'd like to. So many books, so little time...
Post
Soon very soon the teapot will be packed up safely in my car for
Third Coast Kite and Hobby
Self says this genesis surprises people and asks whether, given the period in which the novel was written, there was no element of wanting to warn people of the follies of nuclear war in his planning of the book. “Writing novels with a message, I dare to say – although I’m sure there are examples to prove me wrong – is a sure road to disaster,” says Russ. “I think the best writing is done with what enters you and takes possession of you and doesn’t let go of you until you get the job done.”
The corrupters moved on, safe from the stench of their works. I do wonder sometimes if they are safe from the curses of those they left behind.
The waters are undoubtedly enriched with large amounts of iron, as the photo here shows, giving the waters clear medicinal value. In tasting them, not only do the waters give you that copper-coloured hue, but you can clearly taste the minerals in the water. As with other iron-bearing springs, the water from the New Edge spring is good for the blood, good for anæmia, loss of energy and a low immune system.
Who indeed? Christ Jesus … Lord and Savior … Lamb of God … Bridegroom …
KEVIN VAN HENTENRYCK: They always took casts of my face. And they would use those to produce the different Belial's, the stunt Belial, the hero Belial ect.. That's a cool process, watching the guys who create that stuff,
Summer Joy
Place a Dutch oven over medium high heat until hot. Add oil and tilt pot to coat bottom. Add sausage and cook 5 minutes or until beginning to brown on edges, stirring frequently. Add chicken, pepper stir-fry, tomatoes, water, rice, Worcestershire and thyme. Increase heat to high, bring to a boil. Reduce heat, cover tightly and simmer 25 minutes or
The pauses at the end of lines or stanzas are as deep breaths – our way to fully absorb what’s come before in order to ready ourselves for what comes next. I find most often that it’s in these white spaces that the story can best be realized – not only the story that is being told to us, but the story of ourselves as our own story is revealed by and relates to what we’re reading.
2. What are you doing tomorrow?
In Nigeria, spills are weekly events.
As her self-esteem plummeted before him, Alec’s heart rate increased with anticipation he hadn’t felt all night. He softened his expression, his voice. “Of course I understand you, Brianna. Why don’t I take you home and you tell me all about how misunderstood you are?”
The Blue Guy's eyes did their thing but before they could finish their slot ring, Drazin rung his neck and shook him about. He really made The Blue Guy pout. For he lost his slot machine power as Drazin made him cower. Petsy turned back into herself, Blabber stopped running around like a diseased elf and Irish Air lost her fire. She quickly picked up a wire. Glory Dear smiled at Miss Priss and I as we were able to move once more and it was time we ended her cooking chore. Miss Priss ran around to her behind and I dug a hole as we were done being kind. Miss Priss gave a kick and that did the trick. Glory Dear was buried in the ground until she was no longer found.
Instead of reevaluating its Middle East policy, US continued to support Israel’s brazen flouting of UN resolutions and systematic dispossession of Palestinians, it strengthened its ties to Arab tyrants making their dreaded Mukhabarat services spearhead the rendition and torture of terrorist suspects and, last but certainly not least, it started one grossly-mismanaged war in Afghanistan and another illegal one in Iraq which have both turned into quagmires since.
an eye on the house.
Heleva spends most of the night talking to the bride to be’s sister who refuses to take her shoes off and also seems to share her contempt for the wealthy. “I tell you one good thing about the rich,” she says. “They usually have the best drugs.” With that, the two sneak off, unnoticed, to their hosts master bath. In the medicine cabinet they find a nice big bottle of Oxycoden. Under the sink they find a large dildo as well as legally and morally questionable pornography. Heleva places the dildo on the tub next to a child’s rubber ducky just to fuck with and disturb its owner. She looks thoughtfully at the fake cock. “I guess the rich aren’t that different from us after all." She pockets the Oxy and exits the bathroom.
In the second year of their use of RenaultSport’s KERS, Red Bull appear to have found a new mounting position and format for their KERS energy storage with what appear to be floor mounted super capacitors. Super Capacitors (Supercaps) are an alternative energy storage to Lithium Ion batteries, using very much the same technology as smaller capacitors used in electronics
He started out as an electrical engineer, representing his firm in Europe during the 1930s.
Kewords: Education
The session, part of the eighth series of the award-winning Doha Debates, a leading platform for free speech in the Arab world, comes just weeks after an official investigation found that Bahraini government security forces had used excessive force and widespread torture against anti-government protesters earlier in the year.
I didn't get much done yesterday since I was puttering on several other things as well, like trying to learn how to crochet a hex-base with beads. Still haven't gotten the hang of it yet even with the book and accompanying DVD. Best I've gotten so far looks like a horseshoe shape, like I haven't put on enough beads even though I have the correct number on. Sigh. Harder than it looks. I may have to try one suggestion I got which is to practice without the beads, since I think my problem is the closing the rings and stepping up to the next row (and first stitch after that).
Obviously since I am writing this blog I am pleased to report that I’m very much alive. I’m older perhaps, but still alive and happily still wrinkle free. To those of you who thought I was dead, shame on you! I curse you and hope that all your future children have webbed feet. Technically I’m actually doing you a favour. How awesome would it be to have webbed feet? Why if I had webbed feet I’m pretty confident that I’d almost be able to do two whole laps in the pool.
All in all some unexpectedly good history to learn. And the shopping? A curious haul of socks, bread and two new board games!
Not only in this but countless other areas does Sharp's vision betray a semi-refreshing lack of familiarity with actual bikers, mods/rockers rivalry, Satanists, zombies, or hippies, whether in films, books, or real life. He does know solid British TV detective thriller pacing, so there's competent camera, interesting plot twists, and quite a bit of panning over craftily posed corpses, making PSYCHOMANIA kid-friendly, at least in this lone surviving print.
Wait for me and singalong
watching in
Of course I could not keep this info to myself, I had to share it with my all my friends
Penfold's Top Ten
Finished - 22/4/12
Well..I have not posted a recipe on my blog for such a very long time...! I know that a recipe is neither a decoration or a gift idea, but this particular recipe has been a Christmas dinner tradition for our family for nearly 10 years now...so I just wanted to share it with you:)
xoxo's Paulette
On the DVD commentary, Dan O'Bannon claims he was surprised at how many women were in the initial audiences and said if he'd known he'd have such a large female following he would have shown Suicide naked as well.
Because I want to start brewing.
Standing in their way is an unlikely duo. Agent Bernadette Callahan is an investigator with a shadowy government agency known as Section on the trail of a supernatural killer. Sebastian “Batty” LaLaurie is a lecherous college professor with a talent for drinking large amounts of alcohol and a vast amount of knowledge regarding “Paradise Lost.”
I thought I make a scalloped circle card for a change and I used a card companion image and a backing paper to make my card. I really love how you can make a pretty card in such quick time with this CD!
I remember years ago when I attended a Good Friday church service in Oregon, and a doctor came to speak about the medical perspective of Christ’s crucifixion. He told us that Jesus actually died of a broken heart, not from bleeding from His wounds or excruciating pain or other factors. Jesus must have been very strong physically.
All pictures were taken by myself, Rebecca Hsu.
I was initially thinking that I'd post my report for MMM once a week, but now I think I'll post my reports on MMM challenge less frequently. I found that I'd love to focus my mind on the challenge more. I remembered that it took very long for me to prepare one blog post too. Eek, I'm so slow and inefficient to do this kind of things. But probably it's better to be inefficient than to try nothing, don't you think?
This goregous 1850 house still sat on 2 acres when the current owner paid $4 million for it a few years ago (yes, of course he was from out of town). He split up the land into three lots and has been trying to sell them off piecemeal. This one, on just 0.7 acres now, was asking $3.4 million but today came down to $2.7. It seems to me that this house has little value for those who would otherwise appreciate its splendour if it’s crammed in next to two new houses. On the other hand, with spec house funding dried up, the original lot is still as it was. I know nothing about the seller’s financial condition but this might be a good time to bid $2.5 for the whole thing, and reunite the original lot. If Stanwich hadn’t gone soft and moved to Riverside, I’d have pitched this idea to him. As it is, I’m just tossing it out for all Cos Cob patriots to act on.
Then, working patiently, sometimes interminably slowly, I resolve the mess. This part is about as much fun as prepping for a colonoscopy. This goes on and on, but suddenly, I reach a point. Suddenly, I see how it can all make sense. It’s time to bang on the drum all day. Except, of course, I don’t get to. No one does. We’ve all our other stuff to do.
Proof of the cold (in case you didn't believe me)
I hunt because of the memories of years past, knowing 60 years ago my grandfather hunted underneath this exact tree, or at this exact lake, or in this exact field, with this exact goal. It's like he is still there with me, and even that he will always be there with me while I am hunting. It's knowing my daughter will be in the same spot in years to come. It's knowing that I am passing on to my kids what my grandfather taught my dad and what my dad taught and is still teaching me.
Yahushua wants us to live, feel, think and act like Him. By the power of the Holy Spirit He enables us to follow in the path that He has set before us. Likewise to drink His blood is to absorb His self-sacrificing life motivation and indeed, His very life, since the life of the flesh is in the blood. (Leviticus 17:11) Jew and Gentile alike who are open to this truth of who Yahushua is, are able to accept this truth and find Him acceptable into their very beings by the power of His Spirit.
Went to immigration for retirement visa. Done by 10AM. Cost about 2200 baht. Need to get reentry permit next. Go to pick up passport on Monday. See this and that.. for discussion
tonight tho, Liz, Emily and I are hitting the malls to shop for ball dresses and have a bite to eat and a few wines! just what I need to forget about the woes of the world.
More packs await! (Anyone feeling a Nate Schierholtz auto waiting for me down the road???)
In descriptively treating
The word "lose" means to "not win" and can mean "misplace"
Quick Lesson – Teryaki Sauce: Just buy it unless you wanna be all gung-ho. You could make Teriyaki sauce, but after I did some math in my head of what ingredients I would need and how pricey they were and compared it to how much a bottle of good quality Teriyaki sauce costs, I opted for the store bought Teriyaki sauce. Get a good one. Get the kind where you recognize all the ingredients you would have purchased. My personal favorite is Soy Vay Veri Veri Teriyaki. It bursts with sesame seeds, fresh garlic and ginger powder. I paid $5.99 for the 21 oz. bottle at New Season’s, but I’m sure it’s cheaper somewhere else.
Dietary modifications are essential in the treatment and prevention of ischemic heart disease. The following dietary changes are recommended:
Attributes: Agility-d10, Smarts-d8, Spirit-d8, Strength-d10, Vigor-d10
The tortoise is offered to Putnam’s readers as adventuring courtiers had once presented exotic delights to their stay-at-home monarchs, but to the narrator’s astonishment, a tortoise will magically materialise in the traditional venue of storytelling – “scenes of social merriment, and especially at revels held by candle-light in old-fashioned mansions” – and “with “Momento *****” burning in live letters upon his back.” It has fallen to the scholar Mary-Madeleine Gina Riddle to reason that these words are “Momento Vitae” rather than “Mori.” Perhaps the central subject of this travel narrative is telling his readers to forget their books and remember life.
Pack 6: T.J. Houshmandzadeh, Matt Ryan, Golden Tate RC, Joe Flacco
The Joshua Tree, though, continues to resonate. I don’t listen to it a lot, but it do come back to it fairly regularly—really, a sure sign of a work of lasting value.
This is Joan with Scott’s quilt. It’s awesome. I know his family will
Please also some of our other cool products on the site like Gecko Grip and Blueview LED lighting for channel letters.
Dudette: Hi – My blackberry is not receiving my email msgs. I notice that in the top right corner it says “OFF” next to the telephone pole (?). Will you call me later and tell me what I need to do to “fix” this?
what's a nice thing you do for others?
www.fletc.gov/training/programs/state-local
Cuttlebug Swiss Dots Embossing folder
Go have a look if you are on Facebook. A Glasgow artist, Victoria Evans, challenged everyone and anyone to do a sketch a day, and there was the option to send your sketches in for an Exhibition Day in March. It is quite inspiring and lots of lovely drawings to scroll through.
I spent the majority of my Friday off work in Asda due to an unfortunate incident with one of their cereals. Whilst Tom was innocently munching away on some Choco Flakes he caught his tooth on some sort of mini stone/seed hidden within it and has broken his front tooth. Literally half of it has just crumbled off. They had an "If you're not fully satisfied" number on the back and obviously he wasn't that satisfied so gave it a ring, apparently it's now under investigation but I'm hoping they offer some sort of compensation, we're both quite passive when it comes to complaints but it's going to cost £200 to get his tooth fixed so I think it's only fair that they foot some of the bill? Or do you reckon we're being a bit cheeky?
Moreover, the very fact that such claims are reported without question also shows that opinion already reigns, for Bachmann’s is of course one opinion among others, and because of that we must take it seriously. But, if we really take that logic seriously, we should also teach that aliens colonized the earth, since that, too, is an opinion held by some.
1) 12 Minutes to establish a 1RM High-Bar Back Squat.
you're as old as I was back then.
Maritha
Here are some pictures from any of the 19398 villages that we went to.
Gravity is clear; machine
Thank you, baby Kate.
Stand or Fall (Extended Mix)
And the BEST part is (drumroll please…) the shoes are called
As already noted, it could also be said that the decentralized nature of the early German communities was no different from the decentralization in Greece before the Athenian and Macedonian Empires, the decentralization in Italy before the ascendancy of the Roman Republic or indeed the decentralization of the original Mesopotamian civilization. The important point, here, however is the much longer survival of that form of organization among Germans -- and it is certainly to their German ancestors that the English must trace it.
11. Snared - All-Story Weekly 3 parts Dec 11, 18, 25
Created to merge this duality, Memeoirs is as broad and versatile as email can be and it reflects the habits of the author. It has been used to collect love letters, buddies emails, academic exchanges and even meeting minutes.
It is, of course, assumed that a pragmatic and hence changeable base for any categorization does not prevent that categorization from being repeatable in the case where a similar ontological given is again present. Although offering no particular difficulty, this assumption about human abilities is mentioned because it is one not required by the naive view that our categorization of objects and events is in some sense 'natural'. We could not, of course, speak of a cause if the particular category were not repeatable. To recognize a causal relationship then is to recognize that a particular recurrent stretch of the process-stream is such as to be easily seen as a single event.
1/2 large sweet onion, chopped
On the eve of Richard Lugar’s landslide loss in an Indiana Senate primary, Nate Silver published an analysis of the recent turnover in Senate Republican ranks sorted by their relative ideology. The word “relative” needs to be stressed; using DW-Nominate ratings, Nate splits the GOP Senate Caucus as it existed after the 2004 elections and assigns half of it the “moderate” label. That’s how you get Rick Santorum listed as a “moderate.”
It may seem strange to be discussing failure here. But a willingness to take risks, even quite dangerous ones, is something I admire and encourage in writers. Literature without risk is like a meal without salt: predictable and unappealing. It’s important to bear in mind though that any risks should be based on the percentages, not taken at random or to extremes. Don't try this at home, etc.
Noriega not a happy camper when captured.
In the isolated British Islands the inquisitor was held at bay in much the same manner as the barbarians held off the Romans. The Romans erected their wall. The wall kept the Romans safe and kept the Picts isolated and unmolested. In the day of the first Queen Elizabeth there was the English Channel and Britain’s wooden wall of ships. But still, back in the day of Queen Elizabeth and the 16th Century political geosphere, there was concern amongst Ruthie’s ancestors. The Armada was coming.
Cognitive dissonance is a painful incredulity marked by this inner contradiction in the victim’s attitude towards the victimizer. In 1984, perhaps the best novel about brainwashing that occurs in totalitarian regimes, George Orwell coined his own term for this inner contradiction: he called it doublethink. Doublethink is not logical, but it is a common defense mechanism for coping with deception, domination and abuse. Victims engage in doublethink, or cognitive dissonance, in a partly subconscious attempt to reconcile the contradictory claims and behavior of the disordered individuals who have taken over their lives.
Term insurance plans is an existing cheapest form of life insurance and also it is a helpful device to buy beside hazard of premature death or a defence of as benefit.
“How’d you wake up?” Revd Bilkin said, still not lifting his head to look at Obadiah.
Application for Immigrant Visa/Interview
"Love never fails. But where there are prophecies, they will cease; where there are tongues, they will be stilled; where there is knowledge, it will pass away. For we know in part and we prophesy in part, but when completeness comes, what is in part disappears. When I was a child, I talked like a child, I thought like a child, I reasoned like a child. When I became a man, I put the ways of childhood behind me. For now we see only a reflection as in a mirror; then we shall see face to face. Now I know in part; then I shall know fully, even as I am fully known. And now these three remain: faith, hope and love. But the greatest of these is love."
Horatio and Elennara were thrown from the bed as subsequent explosions rocked and vibrated violently through the ships hull.
Startup Weekend is part of Capital Entrepreneurs Week in Madison.
2. Memoir writing is kind of a persuasive argument. You’re basically arguing that your life, which has elements in it that many other people have probably experienced (unless you’re an exceptional/famous person, and even then…), is interesting enough to be read about. The problem is, you have to make it interesting to read. You could have traveled the world but if you suck at writing the story’s going to get boring and people won’t care. You have to convince them about the importance of what you’re writing about, and make them care as much as you care.
Don't worry........I won't stop stamping to use dimensional stickers. But, I have to admit, they throw a beautiful card together in just a few minutes!
3. On November 4, 2008, Santos admitted that the Colombian military had carried out extrajudicial executions and pledged to resolve the issue. Source El Espectador
* Celebrated New Year's at the cabin
For a variation: Make Strawberry Lemonade by taking 1 pint of strawberries and pureeing in a blender, add to the lemonade mixture, then adding the 2 1/2 cups water. In place of the water you could also add sparkling water or club soda for some carbonation. Decorate with a strawberry on top and a sliced lemon or place in glass.
Blood pressure cuffs and suction machines for clearing airways were dirty and dusty.
Doesn't it just scream sunshine? I plan on making another soon in shades of green and aqua. For the next one I plan on purchasing a walking foot for my sewing machine, which should minimize the kind of twisty look of the edging. I still love it, though, with all its imperfections!
The endplate ducts flow in a “question mark” shape around the top and front of the endplate towards the beam wing. The airflow then passes inside the beam wing profile to a bulged fairing that directs the ducts forwards under the engine cover.
“good pleasure to have those kinde of people sent out of the lande.”
For some inspiration, I created......
the earlier administration of
I sat next to my mom on the nearby bench. She was flipping through it, and I was watching over her shoulder. All of a sudden I put out a hand to stop her from turning the page.
Random Observations
I guess all those people who have given me advice… they were right after all.
Seriously this was the best meal everrrr. Hands down better than any steak I have had. I am a lucky girl & couldn't have asked for a better man in my life! He is such a great cook & I am so thankful for that. We had prime rib, homemade mashed potatoes & carrots which were unlike any I have ever had. I am making your tummy growl now huh? Just looking at the picture makes me want it again. Good thing I have leftovers to eat today :)
Gov. Jerry Brown recommended the state shift responsibility for felons convicted of nonserious, nonviolent and nonsexual crimes to the counties to save money and alleviate prison overcrowding, and the legislature endorsed the plan, which takes effect Saturday. “I enter this whole issue and discussion with a great amount of trepidation,” said Supervisor Greg Cox, who added that more than 250 inmates will be released from state prison next month to be monitored in San Diego County. “That to me is a very, very scary prospect.” Because the county’s jails have room for about 800 additional inmates, the supervisors said San Diego may fare better initially than other counties where the jails are at or near capacity. “I just have this sinking feeling that somewhere down the line somebody is going to be out that shouldn’t be out and do something that they shouldn’t do,” Cox said.
Insomniacs make for maniacs, you pushed yourself out into your balancing act and now there’s no way to get back.
Ms Macdonald’s new proposals sound very much like the old ones dished up again. I expect the Scottish parliament to give them short shrift.
“The council will not be supplying many services in the future as they can unload all the associated pressures and hand it over. The problem with this strategy is that the private sector will only want the profit making good services and the taxpayers will be left with the expensive money draining dregs that the private sector would not touch with a barge pole.
Reduction of stress related hormones which move into baby through the placenta, because of a mental and physical relaxed environment.
Last Saturday Peter Kent in a stinging commentary accused some Canadian charities of laundering foreign monies. Because laundering monies is a criminal offence, it is not surprising that many people in the charitable community were horrified and upset by such a charge. He also used the opportunity to offer a not so veiled threat to charitable groups who engaged in any political activity. Added to the statement was not one example of where monies were laundered or who had engaged in political activity, which left many groups expecting (rightly I would say) that the Harper government intends to systematically begin to go after any organization that is on their “enemy list I might add that particular list is growing by the day!
Joy in my opinion and in my personal experience is directly connected to contentment and gratitude. I’ve learned that joy is very different from happiness. And while happiness feels absolutely wonderful, we must admit it never really lasts. Happiness comes and goes like the things we buy come and go. And although “things” are nice and some are very necessary, joy is rarely found in the things we acquire or how much we acquire.
Under the mash-house floor we were shown a movable platform, on wheels of great height, which runs across the floor to enable the brewers men to get at the bottoms of the elevated vessels when required. The mash-tuns all discharge their draff by means of a wooden shoot, which is attached to an iron one leading into the draff-house, a small detached building in the yard."
and thought I would share.
Mark Powell
Am I justified in being nervous? I don’t know. I will admit, however, this event has forced me to do some soul-searching.
to shear sheep and make wool clothing and blankets
We’ll just have to try! I’m going in!
(Can use prepared white horseradish -experiment with the amount needed.)
Any married couple who is in the habit of using artificial contraception is certainly free to discontinue the practice at any time, and go to confession … instantly making things right with God, their own marriage, and the Catholic Church.
Too bad for Stadium Club that I now know that Kotsay was a Marlin. Gwynn, and thus Pinnacle, win! 10-5...and counting!
F is for all things Fantastic.
I have a serious love/hate relationship with mine.
I just heard someone say there are 365 verses in the Bible referring to Fear Not! I looked it up on several sites and, sure enough, there are Three Hundred Sixty Five references in the Bible about Fear(ing) Not!
It’s funny, but I didn’t realize that I was ‘the first’ until a year or so into Myles of Style. I was focused on maintaining my creativity, developing my skills, and trying to keep up with an absolutely brutal schedule. And I think that’s exactly as it should be – I’m a designer who happens to be a woman of color, not the other way around. I’m not interested in my gender, or the color of my skin defining my place in the industry, because my abilities and success don’t depend on either.
Thank you so much for stopping by today!! If you are going to be at CHA please stop by the Spellbinders booth and say hello! I would love to meet you!!! I hope you have a wonderful and creative day!!
Special shout out to Stephanie Dayton, Ericka Boston, Sonya and Khia from the Sister 2 Sister Team. Good looking out yall! And a super special shout out to my dear friend, BET’s Zabrina Horton. And to my girl Erica Blevins from Oh! My Nappy Hair for rocking out with us.
Lizzy nodded dumbly, eyes blinking in surprise over her mom not perceiving any threat.
Hey!! The sun is shining here and it feels oh so good, love these beauty spring days! Today I wanted to share a recipe for a yummy granola-esque bar that I whipped together for snack for my little man (I may have eaten one or two too…). As I’ve mentioned before, I don’t really like to buy pre-packaged foods because they are often filled with preservatives, tons of sugar, GMO oils, artificial foods & colours…the list goes on, basically a lot of crap. But I do like to have foods on hand that are convenient for snacks or on the go. Now, I don’t make EVERYTHING from scratch, wish I could but that is just not always possible so when I do, I choose very carefully. That being said, this go around I did have some time to bake and experiment! I love try out new combinations and different types of flours so that I am feeding my body a variety of foods. There are so many options out there, each one with their own yummy flavours and nutrients. We also avoid wheat products as much as possible so for that reason too, I like to mix it up!
Although the store has gotten a name change, the girlie designs are still the same.
Family functions were always entertaining. Particularly when I was left alone with Justin's mom. "Did you hear what she said?" "Why is she so loud?" "I can't believe how much gravy she poured over her turkey."
In 1998, Bill Clinton signed Presidential Decision Directive 62 establishing the National Special Security Events, or NSSE, a directive making the Secret Service responsible for security at designated events, including presidential nominating conventions.
6 Stosur, Samantha
precious to the earth.
Yet another of the multitude of things I really looked forward to on my trip to the UK was a chance to see some real suits of armor up close (stop rolling your eyes my English friends). We just don't have that sort of thing in the part of America where I live, other than replicas at Renaissance themed restaurants, so I was really excited to visit the Royal Armories at the Tower of London.
When it comes to career development and technical training, we will work to support our students in securing intensive internships with professionals in that chosen industry, providing opportunities for "real-world" learning, authentic assessment and experience that could eventually provide for certification and even job opportunities.
I got this one from a response to the blog:
However, when I went looking for them, I discovered that every book that has ever made an appearance on my Kindle has a TOC. It’s quite useful actually. You can jump straight to chapter ‘x’ where that really interesting thing happens. I wish I’d known sooner… Also useful if you are switching about between books, I guess.
Akshayananda: He said it. Nitai said it. He said it in this context. He said that Lord Brahma is the acarya in the Brahma-sampradaya, but yet he is sometimes afflicted by passion. So therefore he is saying that it appears that the acarya does not have to be a pure devotee. So it does not seem right.
And what about libraries? We could be in for some rocky times as the digital tidal wave that has already swamped newspapers now reaches us. But we’re trying to do what we’ve always done, which is provide people with reading material and information for their edification and entertainment. Already, in the world of reference, online is the way to go. And as the world goes online, public libraries play an increasingly important role in providing online access and guidance for those who don’t have or can’t afford computers and internet access on their own. Possibly general interest books will go largely digital, too. But I think it will be awhile. The Monroe County Library’s ebook collection, as of this writing, is 549. Our collection of physical books numbers around 150,000.
After hearing Peter’s miniature sermon, the leaders conferred with each other on how to silence these men whom they knew were telling the truth. This goes to show the hardness of their own hearts to the gospel of Christ. They charged Peter and John not to preach the name of Jesus again. Peter and John then give a wonderful response. “Whether it be right to obey men than God, decide ye, but we must preach what we know to be, for we have heard and seen it for ourselves.” They are saying in essence, regardless of what you think, we know this is the message of the Son of God; we are witnesses of it and therefore we must proclaim it as such. Praise God for men who are deeply grounded in the message of truth, who know and are convicted of it and therefore fear not man, and proclaim it regardless of the consequences. Peter and John were faced with deadly opposition and chose instead of folding under pressure, to stand firm and be counted for the name and cause of Christ. Their example should be the same as our lives.
I've never been a finalist before in anything. I was a semi-finalist once but never a finalist. This night at last I was a finalist. There were eight of us. Everyone else was young in their 20s no doubt except the first guy, the guy who read before me who wrote about murder and AIDS and I think someone with AIDS who was murdered but I'm not sure. I don't listen well to the person or persons who read before me. It's not right I know but I can't help it thinking about me getting up there messing up lines missing pages losing my voice but most of all I am distracted by my own excitement my own anticipation.
1- Click on Download Full Template and download the template. It will be named something like template-282235459.xml. You can rename it, but don't alter the extension. I like to rename mine something like CDBtemplate-21509.xml
Please add this new blog to your favorites.
Here's my system for the washing:
Sterilise jars and lids and keep warm.
When I first had about Vision 2030, it’s significance was abstract to me. It was just another government program established to fix problems that the United Nations and other international organisations have been trying to fix for the last 40+ years. Basically, I thought that if the world is struggling to control our nonsense, we had no business trying to fix it when we were what was broken. It was going to fail. And besides that, 2030 was (and still is) years and years from now. I wasn’t even planning to live in Kenya by then. Very patriotic I was, neh?
Harr’s motions also devote considerable space to a claim of conspiracy on behalf of the Durham Police Department and the Durham DA’s office to invent and prosecute unsustainable charges against Mangum, because the “Defendant was the accuser in the Duke Lacrosse case.” Harr provides no explanation as to why the office of would-be lacrosse case second chair Tracey Cline or the Durham Police, which in 2006 spent months violating procedure after procedure in an attempt to prop up Mangum’s false charges, would have an incentive to invent criminal charges against Mangum. And, needless to say, he presents no evidence to sustain his . . . counterintuitive . . . theory.
In a situation like this, where a question of usage appears contentious, you have options. You can take the word of self-appointed “experts” who seem to think grammar is the sum of spelling, style, statutes and censure, who find fault with vast chunks of the world’s English-speaking population, who rarely if ever offer reputable references to support their dogma, and who rest their case on personal preference and a stern or mocking tone (and sometimes, as a treat, an eccentric application of logic).
I didn't feel up to working last night, but I thought I should tidy my desk ready to start. So here is the view from the glue side.
9 I saw a miniature pony shagging a pig at the zoo.
get me back
Text: Nehemiah 13, Luke 15:3-7
Angelo Marc Jandugan need not be too worried as the Singapore government has proclaimed its intention to mass-import more ‘foreign talent’ like himself into Singapore as exemplified by a statement released by the National Talent and Population Division under the Prime Minister’s Office two days ago:
News Conference to be held at Hard Rock Hotel, Muse Ballroom.
When the going gets tuff – get going. Run like hell, and let the troops die in your place.
English philosopher Michael Oakeshott described two sorts of knowledge:
Library OneSearch: tab added to allow searching by journal title
Taken: 12/03/2010
So, it was in that order of things I received this email yesterday.
Jeddah’s history goes back some 2500 years, when the area was first inhabited as a small fishing village. Its location on the Red Sea and its close proximity to Mecca played important roles in Jeddah’s importance and growth in the ensuing years. Mecca is the holiest city of Islam. All Muslims are required to journey to Mecca at least once in their lives for the religious pilgrimage called the Haj, with many Muslims making the trip more times than just the once. Since Jeddah is the closest seaport to Mecca and only a one hour drive away by car, Jeddah benefits economically from the millions of pilgrims who make this trip each year. Jeddah’s airport is also the largest in the whole region as well, with a special terminal just for Haj pilgrims. Because of this tremendous influx of visitors from all over the world, Jeddah is thought to be a little more progressive, cosmopolitan and informal than the capital city of Riyadh, which gets far fewer outside visitors. Riyadh lies smack dab in the middle of the country, a tad isolated from the rest of the world, and is surrounded by mostly nothing but desert for many miles.
Andy spends a good bit of time creating with his Bionicles many days. I always mean to snap more photos than I actually get.
All the thrills, the sights, the people, the bay air: It all feels like what I thought home would feel like.
5. Help her enjoy the day.
about crawling in bed with you, naked and wet
Contest Rules:
We also saw the well maintained amazing museum and I bowed to the deity Mulikeswara for good health. Dattapeetham is an inspiration for anyone who strives to serve this cause in as perfect a way as possible.
I, of course, watched the interview, but my students are picking up on something I must have missed. Several of them have pointed out that Bill O’Reilly accused Marilyn Manson of being a member of the Church of Satin.
The leisure centres in Sittingbourne & Sheppey are also run by a trust but no one knows who sits on it or when it meets. I lodged a Freedom of Information request about it a few years ago which the Council took a year to process. They came back saying I couldn’t be given the minutes of the meetings it held because it was a limited company. It’s easier to find out what is happening at Lehman Brothers than what lies at the heart of your own leisure services.
The article began with the paragraph: “David Cameron launches a devastating attack today on 30 years of multiculturalism in Britain, warning it is fostering extremist ideology and directly contributing to home-grown Islamic terrorism”. In his speech, Cameron “warns Muslim groups that if they fail to endorse women’s rights or promote integration, they will lose all government funding”. In terms of Britain’s new policy, “all immigrants…must speak English and schools will be expected to teach the country’s common culture.” The article states that Cameron blames a doctrine of “state multiculturalism” which encourages different cultures to live separate lives, and which he believes, is “the root cause of radicalisation which can lead to terrorism”.
Oh the irony inherent in a man who hates the bullying of gay people, using a gay slur to insult others.
This is my card for the CAS-ual Friday's Challenge this week. I don't know why, but I have a really hard time photographing white cards, so please excuse my poor photography skills today. I posted two photos in hopes of it helping to see my card better. I stamped six flowers from the Flutter By set from Lawn Fawn and colored them with Copics in pale teal and purple hues. I placed clear gems in the centers of the purple flowers. I outlined the layer with teal woodgrain washi tape from Amy Tangerine and added a sentiment flag with a sentiment from the same stamp set hanging slightly off the edge of the card base.
It’s about time I did the whole preface to the Books in the Mail post, so here goes….
2 rod
Papa Spanky
The three in the centre are mine .They are prince charming and Cinderella rag dolls and A Bunny !!Sadly I don't know where they ended up but my latest bunny is a influenced by her.Their dresses are pretty much the same.
For the joy on my little princess's face, I would do it over and over again.
I absolutely love Allyson Hannigan, so I’d have to say her.
While many in Europe were fed up with the bitter cold, residents in the Netherlands were disappointed with a slight warming in that country that resulted in a legendary iceskating race along canals being cancelled.
Why yes! Besides this pic! We had a picnic lunch and that was ok, rolls with bbq chicken, cheese and lettuce, but then it was a piece of cake here and about 4 anzac biscuits later, that I kinda felt like you could have rolled me home! We did walk a lot and when I got home P and I both proceeded to have a sleep!
Here's how they look:
Lighten up. You must have heard someone say that to you at some time or another.
I really feel like I have some amazing influences surrounding me right now and that makes this desire for a stronger faith even greater. Thanks to you!
You should be known by your religiosity of the day. If I don’t move the moon, the day has not been worthwhile.
The first kind, is the kind you don't want. You know what I'm talking about.
From the boys at Unibrou in Quebec. I started with this one as it had only 8% alcohol while the Unibrou I had had 9%. I had this one in a mix with Guinness back at Downing Street pub sometime ago, but never by itself. I first smell the apples before I notice the color. Deep cloudy orange with a strong offwhite head in my wine goblet. A little more focus smelling of the beer yields fruit (mainly apples) , banana, and some of that bret/sourness you get in most Belgians. Taste is kinda brown sugar and plum like. High carbonation with moderate drinkability. Ah, there are those Belgian yeast notes, with that fruitiness and sourness. It nice but I've had some better Belgians. That carbonation is not getting it for me. I know they bottle conditions their beers, so that's probably where it comes from. It sours and tarts up a bit as it warms. 3 Stars.
The recent debate over the need to reform, strengthen and generally reinvigorate intellectual property rights has taken on a stirring note, as IP champions have argued that we can innovate our way out of the current financial malaise that has blotted the economic performance of some of the world's most creative nations. With better IP protection, it is argued, there will be more investment in innovation, with the result that new jobs will be created, more people will be gainfully employed and paying taxes rather than living off them.
Studio Operations and Maintenance
Before serving add the avocado and stir to combine.
We finished the formal tasting with a Left Hand Milk Stout which was very much a desserty end to the savoury offerings enjoyed to that point. The Beer Ambassadors closed out the evening with a terrific story that seemed to require selected edits from each of the boys in order to fill in all the missing details that each suffered from. Let’s just say that if you ever find yourself lost, looking for a taxi on a strange corner in a state of fairly severe inebriation, you could do worse than to wake up on a sofa next to a rather large Mexican named Purnell who, until that very minute was a complete and utter stranger and who, as it turned out, didn’t violate you in any way. That you can remember.
The documentary Poliwood, directed by Barry Levinson, explores how the celebrity and the politician have merged into a single entity; there is no clear distinction between the two anymore, if there ever was one. The celebrity adopts and dramatizes public issues, the politician is required to present their arguments with the skills of an entertainer, and both are required to perform on camera.
Then there is this atmosphere of Jane Austen's view on relation ships etc. that a lot of people has fallen in love with: The idea of finding a real-life Mr Darcy. "The Jane Austen Book Club" by Karen Joy Fowler touches a bit of that - though indirectly - but there are still references to the books of Jane Austen.
Afterimage by Kristine Kathryn Rusch & Kevin J. Anderson
Origin: French
Jinja was the cat who found all this of least interest. One of the reasons was probably that she's the smallest and thus have the shortest legs. So she got behind already when the kittens had crossed the road. She was also a little hesitant about this new territory. In the pic she's the little black dot to the left, feeling very lonely as the boys run up the hill, leaving her behind.
White spots
8.) (21 April 2006) “It could have helped her, if she had been drunk . . . but she clearly wasn’t.”
The used products are then sent off to be re-used or recycled. This means they are either broken down and re-used to create raw materials, or they will be re-used in case they are still in a suitable condition, or they will be recycled into new products. With this new initiative PUMA helps to protect the environment, aspiring to eliminate waste by recycling used products to create new ones. This effort is one more step forward toward the long-term goal of transitioning to a closed cycle loop for materials usage.
Age/Genre: Picture Book (ages 4-8)
The gratitude and love I feel for my friends is immeasurable, so to write a post about how amazing they are
“And that would be an image of…?”
Last Friday was the first meeting of a conversation group arranged through the university where Spanish students who want to learn English get together with American students (who, obviously, want to learn Spanish) and practice conversing together. I joined a group with 2 American boys and 3 Spanish girls. They (the Spanish students) are having exams this week, so we are going to do more stuff after the exams are over with. We got dinner on Saturday night at a Turkish place and then went to their apartment (the Spanish girls are roommates so it worked out nicely).
Page 1 is identical to page 1 for Christianity, detailing the meaning of discrimination and quoting the Human Rights act.
The water is cold and fast-running, the gravel clean in Duffins Creek, which spills into Lake Ontario at Ajax, creating a perfect nursery for Atlantic salmon. It’s one of four waterways — including the Credit River, the Humber River and Cobourg Brook — rehabilitated in the past six years to welcome the once-flourishing native species, which vanished at the end of the 19th century. Dams, deforestation, agricultural runoff had made the streams inhospitable. Add to that overfishing — there were reports of thousands being caught in single night. Now, trees are being planted on the banks to increase shade and lower water temperature, and fences are being erected to prevent livestock from polluting the stream and damaging spawning beds. Strains of salmon from Nova Scotia, Quebec and Maine have been hatched and released in Duffins Creek, some 800,000 so far. Scientists are watching to see which is the hardiest and are hoping for signs of wild reproduction.
He will always be part of me.
Maybe if people do not know just yet, the rubber grip of my camera is GONE. BOO. However, I still managed to take photographs of myself levitating.
"I’m sure all those books are well written," he writes. "So is 'Horton Hatches the Egg.' But Horton doesn’t have the depth of language and character as literature written for people who have stopped physically growing." Then he goes on to explain that he doesn't actually know what any kids' books are like, because he doesn't read them, because he's a grown up. "I have no idea what The Hunger Games is like.... I don’t know because it’s a book for kids."
Turner has called on his listeners to 'take action' against officials and elected members of city, state, and federal government. He published the home addresses of court justices with the suggested intent that they be harassed or harmed.
I'm PR friendly! If you have a beauty related product or service you'd like to see featured here? I'd love to hear from you. I am open to reviewing pretty much any product- I'll try anything!
now on the blue towel we set for
That’s where Aunt Bertha comes in. Using information the team learns about various programs, Aunt Bertha matches people with public services available locally or federally, based on their specific needs.
I home in on a beacon. A splash of bright turquoise shining, nay, glowing in a wintery world made up of black and grey. I set my course. There is no stopping me. I rush over. I extend my hand and lunge.
No, we don’t have a pet.
i had an amazing month off of rest and relaxation with family and friends who had listed me as a missing person. here's what i did in bullet points (because let's be honest, no one wants to read):
However, the contributors do not simply tell you how to get these circumvention fares. Everything in the thread is coded.
Six livery drivers were indicted on charges of promoting prostitution. Individuals who paid for the services of the prostituted women are expected to be charged in the coming days.
I think I’m one of the few people who doesn’t get offended by the sight of a cancer stick between someone’s lips. In fact, as long as you’re not smoking next to me, I say, knock yourself out (my middle name isn’t Surgeon General, after all). So I guess you can say that I enjoyed all the photos although the last one is the yummiest.
Bursting with that hidden fire,
Also, her hair and make-up cost $1700.00. Cash.
please don't confuse this with permissiveness, though.
I also have two other goals for this month that are not related to my resolutions. I want to earn $15 in Amazon gift cards through Swagbucks. I also want to complete two knitting projects that force me to learn a new skill or stitch.
I love you so much Squeaky!! My heart honestly grows fonder for you with each passing day. I can't wait to see more of your personality come through in the next month. You are my precious gift and I thank God every day that he gave me you.
ANIMALS
I watched the penultimate episode of Homeland last night and when the man was making the suicide jacket, by liberally sprinkling the tray of pasty explosive with ball-bearings, I couldn’t help but be reminded of the recently publicity stunt by Nick Clegg who helped make focaccia bread in Morrisons bakery…
Let’s dissect the paragraph.
This would be the perfect selection for a romantic brunch or anyone wanting to enjoy their finest offerings. From starter, to second course, main course, and dessert this is sure to be a gourmet meal not forgotten.
As part of the ‘customer care program’ all guests are personally met by a Customer Care team member on arrival and presented with a complimentary tropical fruit cocktail. Allowing time for the guests to settle into their rooms/bures, a courtesy call is made to ensure guests are happy or need any further assistance with their room/bures. They are also advised of the complimentary entertainment or activities on their arrival day/evening such as the Traditioinal Fijian Meke (dance show), Indian Curry cooking lessons, the Five Tribes live band, coconut tree climbing and basket weaving demonstration, Management Drinks Invitation for 1 hour at the Pool Bar with Serenaders and the Torch Lighting Ceremony followed by ‘happy hour in the resort bars’.
As an ecopsychologist, Dr. Esmerelda Green is skilled at solving the mysteries of the mind, especially if they collide with the laws of nature. But when a body is found below the crumbling cliffs near her Los Angeles home, she is pulled back in time to a tragedy that defies all understanding.
Teddy Long is with Vickie Guerrero, he said at Night of Champions, Dolph Ziggler will defend his United States Title against Jack Swagger, John Morrison, and Alex Riley in a Fatal four-way match. HHH approves this. Vickie said that HHH may not even be in charge after Sunday night, Vickie then talks to someone out of the camera, and it’s Kelly Kelly. Kelly said that Teddy may listen to her a bit more, if she was nicer. Vickie doesn’t need any advice from a “Barbie” Kelly. Vickie said she hopes Beth Phoenix will beat her this Sunday in Buffalo, but it won’t be that difficult, even she can beat Kelly. Teddy makes the match, so it’s Kelly Kelly Vs Vickie Guerrero tonight.
Sheik Yousuf Al-Qaradhawi: Female masturbation is more risky than male masturbation. Male masturbation is not as risky. Sometimes women insert finger, and some women insert objects that may be risky, especially since the hymen is very sensitive, and any playing with it may tear it. This might expose the woman to accusations. She may tell them this or that, but they will not believe her. They will think she must have had forbidden relations with some guys. This way, a person exposes himself to accusations of fornication, a woman might be accused of fornication. She will bring disgrace upon herself and her family. This will be a disaster, and some relatives might kill her. Some people do not stop at the boundaries of religious law. Driven by jealousy and rage, they might commit a crime and kill the girl. Obviously, killing her is forbidden and is a grave sin. Even if she did fornicate, she does not deserve to be killed. At most, she should be flogged, if she confesses four times, or if there were witnesses. Therefore, I do not advise the girls ever to resort to this. A girl must be patient. The thing that tempts such girls, I am sad to say, is that they teach one another. One says to the other: “I did this and that,” or “I saw a film, in which they did this and that. ” Some TV channels, especially European ones, show outrageous sexual things, which are unacceptable by our standards, our moral values, and religious law. These things are rejected. These scandalous, nude films… A girl might learn things from these people. A Muslim girl must commit herself to what her God decreed. She must take care of herself, fast, pray, be God fearing, keep herself busy. She can read a useful book, prepare her homework, join a charity, and spend her time doing things that are useful to her in this world and the world to come, instead of thinking about satisfying her urges, especially in a manner forbidden by religious law
Teri Youmans Grimm – Dirt Eaters
Don’t Eat the Butt #4 – Real Writers Never Struggle by Kristen Lamb – I know this post is a couple weeks old, but it is still worth a mention. Don’t let the word “Writers” in the title fool you – this post is for anyone and everyone. A great lesson that we all need to be reminded of.
The applicable law to govern Innovia's breach of confidence claim was the English law. This was because it was sensible to opt for the law with which Frito-Lay's obligation to Innovia and the consequences of its were most closely associated.
So, earlier I was reminded of The Good Men Project by the fact that their spamtacular Twitter account unfollowed me on Twitter so they could spam-follow someone else. So I went to check out their site. The rant which follows has almost nothing to do with the fact they unfollowed me on Twitter, although that does clearly mark them out to be wrong'uns right from the get-go.
However, the city's center continued to migrate uptown, and Fifth Avenue gradually became what it now has been for decades, one of the world's best known shopping districts. In 1914, Lord and Taylor's fourth and current 11 -story flagship store opened up on the corner of 5th Avenue and 39th Street. And each morning, the sales associates gather on the second floor, play the national anthem (a tradition that started in the '70s in solidarity for the hostages in Iran) and have the rally, committing to sell, sell, sell!
That handsome man has always been my soulmate and he will always captivate me. At every party, or bar, I will always look at him from across the room with new eyes because every day is a new day, with new adventures and feelings. At the end of every new day, I can go home with him and kiss him whenever I want to because we have found each other.
Those three were the only I’ve tested so far, but there are plenty bookmarked for later, including a couple from the ‘On Toast’ section like the versatile Red Mullet on Toast with Crushed Broad Beans and Peas (which would make an elegant starter or a light main), and the Smoked Haddock Rabbit – Hix’s fishy take on the Welsh Rarebit. I also plan to attempt the more elaborate Chicken and Lobster Pie at some point (a variation on the Rabbit and Crayfish number that won a past season of ‘Great British Menu’), as well as many of the tempting quintessentially British puds at the back.
Be sure to play along every week....the more you play the more chances you get to win :).
I like how the parts of the transfer that didn't come out actually look like worn peeling paint from a building.
Combine the chocolate, cocoa powder, espresso powder, water, and whiskey in a medium heatproof bowl. Place over a saucepan filled with 1 inch of gently simmering water, and stir frequently until the chocolate is melted and the mixture is smooth. Remove from the heat.
Well, just thank God that the Obama administration which looks down so magnanimously on hard-core black against white racism is so on the ball when it comes to attacking the decent citizens of Arizona.
Here’s me last year… right about this same time. A year ago today I was two days from my due date with Brynja.
Combine the egg yolks and 1/2 cup (100 grams) of the sugar in a medium bowl and whisk until the mixture turns a very pale yellow and doubles in volume. (If you own two electric mixer bowls, you can whip the yolks in an electric mixer fitted with the whisk attachment)
honestly? i think maybe i just wanted to give a shout out to my favorite artists.
It is obvious the crowd that attended this concert was having a great time. The band cooked, the crowd was excited and King Biscuit captured it as well as could be asked. There is a lot of atmosphere on the recording, but unlike many live recordings the crowd noise does not distract. Instead it adds to the feeling of excitement. I think that with Canned Heat, as with the Grateful Dead and other blues bands, the crowd is as much a part of the performance as the music.
8/15 Springfield, IL- Illinois State Fair
1:50: John Jacob Astor puts his wife in Boat 4, then asks Officer Lightoller if he might join her due to her delicate condition. Lightoller refuses, sticking to the “women and children only” policy, and Astor stays on board the ship. Mrs. John Thayer and Mrs. George Widener are also on this boat, leaving their sons and husbands behind.
It is also a recipe for possibility. Share a vision. Build capacity and skills. Find incentives in focusing on the values based mission of providing together for our learners. Creatively assess and develop resources even in financially trying times. Plan and develop an action plan collaboratively. Celebrate even the small successes.
Victorian Pocketwatch Necklace!
Close to My Heart Patterned paper
Kung Fu Hustle (cameo by the Buddha!),
-Download them to a folder in the computer. (I have an instragram folder, inside that folder a folder for each year, and then inside the year a folder for each month. I also have a "a day in the life" folder in each month to keep those separate as well as the rest of the other photos I've taken from that month into that folder.)
It is amazing how technology has transformed our way of living. Many years ago this would have just been a wishful thought but now everything just seems within reach in the convenience of your own home especially when you turn on your computer and get online. Now with the United Nation’s recognition of internet use as a basic human right, we can foresee the importance of the technology in communication and trade not just today but more so in the coming generations.
Today in church the sermon was about gaming God. I hadn't thought about it, but this really brought home a lot about my life. Father talked about the times in our lives when we have our backs against the wall and we make a deal with God. I was there. When I was on the plane to SE Asia I was gaming God. I made a deal with Him about getting me out safely. If He did it I'd be a better Catholic. The priests at the base I came from passed out rosaries and I took one with no particular idea that I would use it more than I had in the past. On the plane, I don't mind telling you I was working those beads! Of course, when I came back I wasn't the Christian I should have been. I got out in one piece and I'm happy about that.
I received Jacob’s results of the evaluation that Dr. Wilkinson performed on him. Pull up a copy from Jacob’s records, review it, and then, I would like to know how you can justify the three years and counting that has passed with no long term strategies in place to help my son succeed as a PBC student. Jacob’s evaluation includes words such as “Significantly Below Average”, “Functional Weaknesses”, “Low Average”, “Functioning in the Below Average Range of Intellectual Ability”, “May be Expected to Occur in Only 3% of the Normative Population, etc.” And then there is my favorite part of the revaluation, one of the final recommendations stating that “FURTHER ASSESSMENT SHOULD INCLUDE…”
For me it's this impending doom feeling mainly because it just seems like icky stuff keeps happening. Not the worst of the worst, I haven't lost all perspective. My uncle recently had a heart transplant AND stem cell replacement, so I know what real difficulty is. Mine are just a series of things - getting an email from a couple who wants to return the dogs (dogS, plural!) they adopted from us eight years ago. EIGHT years people! WTF? getting pneumonia, losing our sweet kitty. Stuff that sucks on their own but when you string them together over two weeks time you get a case of the mean reds.
Consider those who are legally blind. You ever think that they aren’t as disadvantaged as we sometimes think? What if God has already shown them the beautiful things of this world before birth? What if they know EXACTLY the things we refer to but cannot find a similarity because we ineffectively describe something bigger than words? For every disadvantage God makes an advantage. In (Exodus 4:10) God didn’t tell Moses to be discouraged because of a speech impediment! God told Moses to get up and lead!!! God even instructed Aaron to assist Moses not because Moses was unable to complete the assignment but because God is just that generous. I don’t feel the need to feel regret concerning those who are deaf. They aren’t some type of faulty beings. I am sure deaf Christians can hear from the Lord just as clearly as those who aren’t. And is that not the most critical and respected type of hearing? What is the point of having physical eyes and not being able to see spiritually? Or having physical ears without being able to hear spiritually? God doesn’t make mistakes and nothing can happen unless God first signs His initials on the dotted line.
Okay, that didn’t go so well. I should use less details. Maybe I should try to stay away from certain words that could be misconstrued so that I don’t have to keep explaining myself. Alright, those words include old, youth, stalker, love, lust, and diapers.
"We were, but now I need evidence," he replies, coldly.
Dymphna was concerned by the tone that appeared in the comments almost immediately after I posted. Accusations and counter-accusations flew, and pleas to avoid a “blog war” were aired. She was mystified — why was this request a “blog war”? All we had done was to help Elisabeth make a public request that her name and image be withdrawn from their publicity.
And Brain, how dare you? Sleep and I try to get along. We’ve made up. I’ve taken Sleep out to dinner. To the movies. Bus rides. Sleep wanted to hang out so bad once upon a time that I called her up while I was changing the baby’s diaper.
164Long-sounding aisles, and intermingled graves,
America's schools are changing, and not for the better.
Think about it. A horse with circumscribed stripes… At what point did “Mama Nature” orchestrate such a manifestation? Which came first: a horse of white with dark stripes or the other way around? A Gestalt secret solved only by unraveling then puzzling together the pieces. “Mama Nature” is giggling and only she, along with the zebra, knows what it all means.
I wanted to do something.
I woke up this morning looking like the Mad Hatter.
It was such a pleasure to meet those young writers and hear their work. (They inspired me to update the Tips for Young Writers Page on my website.)
Today I went to Macy's and I bought a Kitchen Aid mixer! and some other stuff since I've decided to start baking. I've been cooking and I apologize for my lack of updates about that but I did make a pancetta and pasta dish as well as crab cakes, a yummy dessert, a vanilla cake and cupcakes.
And now they're back...as Ashford Registry's Who's Who Of Whatever They Think They Can Sell To Whomever They Think They Can Sell It.
The Silbermans began fighting more, often over little things. Mr. Silberman tried to get his wife to talk about what was wrong. She refused, turning on the TV or going to another room. After Ms. Cook demanded her husband move out, he pushed her to reconsider, to think of the children. He promised to change. Then he moved to a hotel, hoping the separation would be short-lived.
* dear tanguera-2. you understand that you just defined a word with the word itself. but i won't point that out, because i am nice like that. ;-)
Thanks again to everyone for your kind comments, I've felt much better the last few days.
It is the practice of some people, in making soap, to put the lime near the bottom of the ashes when they first set it up; but the lime becomes like mortar, and the lye does not run through, so as to get the strength of it, which is very important in making soap, as it contracts the nitrous salts which collect in ashes, and prevents the soap from coming, (as the saying is.) Old ashes are very apt to be impregnated with it.
parents.
heroes and heroines
A friend just had a baby, another just had a miscarriage, and another old friend - may she rest in peace - just lose her life in labor, left behind a husband, a son, and a newborn baby.
He loves food, and eats a ton! Some of his favorites are sausage, calzones, homemade pizza, turkey noodle soup, breadsticks, and hamburgers.
It has once caused me to have a small freak out at work, which is not what I wanted to happen. It looked a little like an anxiety attack and it certainly didn’t feel very good.
I had the opportunity to do a teeny impromptu shoot with some very special puppies. Here are my faves from the bunch.
When he arrived at the end of the course, Tevye announced that Lightning McQueen was now The King of France.
nipples sirened. Sawed back
Consider Rhett and Scarlett, whose movie was on TV just in time to bring them to mind for this article. Neither Rhett nor Scarlett are perfect, but they are good characters. Great characters. They give us reasons to both loathe them and root for them. They are bold, brash, audacious, and larger than life. They pull us into their lives not by their goodness, but by their manner. Their personalities. Their daring and confidence. Who would work his way through Margaret Mitchell’s tome without the
First, to be eligible, you need to sign up for Nina's fun mailing list, which lets you in on exclusive sale offers - you'll also receive 20% off your next order by signing up! How great is that? ;o)
Step 4: I'm a big fan of fabric textures, so I added one from The Coffee Shop Blog. She has lots of free textures, and her blog has been an invaluable resource for me in everything from figuring out how to use PS, to how to make cool stuff for my blog. HERE is a link to her free textures page. I used her Coffee with Cream fabric texture, in Linear Burn mode, at 54% opacity. Although I loved what this did to my photo, I thought it was a little too dark. However, if I made the opacity less, the effect wasn't showing up enough.:
Midwives advising women who are intending to give birth physiologically will encourage minimal interference as labour establishes and progresses. If their plan is to go to hospital for the birth, the transfer will usually occur after the labour has established. Key features of midwife care for planned vbac include:
Today I have worked directly on the card blank, giving it a fancy edge with the MS Crown punch and some DI. The sentiment (GT102) and clock background (A24) have both been stamped with black, while the butterfly (GA61) has been heat embossed with gold embossing powder then coloured with distress stains. A few gems, flowers and leaves (using the Vines die set from Whimsy Stamps), provide additional colour and dimension.
RECORDED WITH 30 YEAR OLD 2 INCH ANALOG TAPE FOR EXTREME SENSATIONS TO THE EARHOLES!!
We made a stop at our new local book store on Friday because it had been a very long time since anyone had gotten a new book. We use to go to Borders all the time. We were so sad when Borders closed, but BAM opened up not to long after, so we were happy that we had a book store again.
Most of the time I do focus on all the good things. This one day a year I succumb to a baser instinct and go big time for carbs, meaty stuff and things that comfort.
I'm also going to try to use more fresh fruits and vegetables. To soak my beans instead of opening a can. To plan ahead so I'm not stuck pulling out the frozen pizza at the last minute.To cut down on the amount of chemicals in my kitchen (I suppose I should start in the most obvious place, by kicking - once again - my diet soda habit. Shhh... don't tell Emily)
While I understand the long-lasting effects of bullying and love seeing former nerds dominate in the real world, I couldn’t side with Jonah Hill’s character on this one. He just isn’t as grown up as Jenko, but thankfully their little spat is short-lived.
There wasn't much snow, but we stuffed Rowan into his snow suit anyway and wrapped him into the carrier for walks in the frigid cold. When the wind bit my cheeks, I'd bury my face into sleeping Rowan's hot hood like the lucky mama I am.
The story behind the cake is almost as amazing as the actual cake. First off the cake was surrounded by candy bars, his favorite is Snickers, but I couldn't pass up the Reese's simply because he loves chocolate and peanut butter - AND they were covered with Superhero emblems. If his cake had not been AC/DC it would have totally been something superhero oriented.
We had an education fair at our homeschool co-op recently and used this project for the fair. It was a great to review all of the things we have discussed throughout the year. My son was so proud of the work he did and presented it all by himself at the education fair.
This post is to announce the winner of the Heartfelt Creations Blog Hop.
It is up to you what you create...the only RULE being that you use at least ONE PENNY BLACK IMAGE...LARGE SENTIMENT OR STICKEROO
With so much attention on the sonics it can be easy to ignore the words, and actually I’d say the lyrical content is the record’s least interesting aspect. In that same interview from above, Hunter discussed the subject matter, going into some heady stuff about Dada and transhumanism and “denying our animal selves.” I’m not sure what she meant, and I’m not sure that it matters. This isn’t an album about a specific narrative, it’s about sounds and colors and the way a synth tone or cryptic string of words hits you and makes you feel something. When the guitars are chugging and the drums are crackling and Hunter sings, “When I finally let my guard down, I was in the middle of the sea and drowning,” I don’t know what she means exactly, but it gives me goosebumps. Every time.
And I'll do my best to remember the sweet babies that Hannah and Max were for me.
Penguin Paperback Original
Then there’s the destructive play. I run a constant ticker tape, calculating energy-required-to-tidy-up-mess-being-made VS energy-saved-by-getting-a-break-while-destruction-is-wreaked. Eg toilet roll unravelling = well worth it. Emptying clothes draw on the other hand, is not. This is Gertie’s latest ‘toy’:
Paul Burstow, the care services minister, said: “This report exposes the urgent need to update our NHS. We need a culture where poor practice is challenged and quality is the watchword. The dignity of frail older people should never be sidelined.”
Fuller Smith & Turner PLC Fuller's London Porter
Turn on low and add 1 can cream of chicken soup, 1/2 stick margarine, 1 block cream cheese (cut in cubes)
I know I am this time of year. Holidays, meetings, work, holidays, meeting, dinners, networking events, holidays functions and so on. You get it. These times it seems our employees are a bit more distracted.
"We are supported by the state, but not representing it. We are completely independent, artistically and politically."
We LOVED Cabo! From what we saw of it anyway. We definitely want to go back, but at this point it would probably be at an all-inclusive type place. Which seemed to be all over! The weather was the best in Cabo too, so maybe that was part of our decision of why we liked it the best. It also seemed more modern, less street vendors and a lot cleaner than the other 2! Who knows though, since we really just saw the pier.
In the end we knew we couldn't get all the crap off my clothes and so I had to sheepishly go back to the wedding with everyone noticing. I put my head down, wrung my hands and said:
Soldiers young, and soldiers old,
i am grumpy about it.
At least one person approved. Obama’s uncle Said Obama reportedly told Reuters by telephone from the president’s ancestral village of Kogelo in western Kenya: “It is humbling for us as a family and we share in Barack’s honor… we congratulate him.”
OK, I'm done and doner and tired as hell and the bruise on my hip is telling me to lie the fuck down or it'll punch me in the dick.
Beside her the wolf remained anxious.
–you like a slower pace questing system
- Take half of the mixture and spread it across one side of steak, pressing it into the meat. Flip the steak and do the same to the other side.
Back into woodland, the track continues on a level plateau across Coldharbour Common and Duke’s Warren. To the north, a shallow bank and low, moss-covered sandstone wall, the latter topped with beech trees whose twisted roots seem to coalesce with the rock, the boundary between timber and mineral impossible to define. Beyond, an expanse of restored heathland, mostly blue-green heather and pine, but splashed with occasional bright golden autumnal birch. Dropping steeply downhill, the path tracing a most graceful curve along a narrow gully, brings me to the convergence of a number of paths; one leads southwards into a deep narrow gorge, dappled sunlight stippling the amber beech leaves, but I head uphill to the west up a natural staircase formed of sandstone strata and tree roots to the summit of Leith Hill.
ELSEWHERE
thrusts
both celestial and earth born.
When an unsuspecting person can be betrayed as to uphold a presented idea as indicating something real, which means the idea is attributed weight or value, then that person can be somatically affected. The reason is that ideas act as directives to the body, so if the idea is treated as a pointer to some real condition then it will lead to somatic reactivity. The examples as we saw so far are found in the creation of heart attack scare (medically called a panic attacks) and the real heart attack, which are essentially the same thing but with a little preparatory work on the part of the culprits. Thus given the right conditions ideas can be used as powerful weapons but only when the person targeted is unsuspecting of the foul play and medically misinformed.
"1. Put butter and 1/3 cup confectioners' sugar in the bowl of an electric mixer fitted with the whisk attachment, and mix on medium speed until pale and fluffy. Add the lime zest and juice and the vanilla, and mix until fluffy.
Valentine's Day in NYC can be a world of hurt for your wallet, which is all the more reason to keep things local. If you haven't made reservations yet, ditch the ritzy Manhattan scene on Monday night and have a relaxed Sunday Afternoon Tea at Lily & Fig (and don't forget the flowers at Park Delicatessen).
What Virgin Atlantic promises to be a “cutting-edge Upper Class cabin” will also include an updated bar design located by the entrance, a new in-flight entertainment system plus a refreshed “fine dining” menu, with an ’express supper menus’ for lighter meals and quicker service.
Result: Wade Choate wins via Submission (guilletine) in Rd 2
Meyer CR. Semen quality in workers exposed to carbon disulfide compared to a control group from the same plant. J Occup Med 1981; 23: 435-439.
Executive producer Steve Milne (Moon- co-producer)
Papers, presentations, reports and workshops are invited on issues on or broadly related to any of the following themes:
Bath City and Kettering Town have been relegated, Fleetwood Town near certainly promoted, while Darlington and Chesterfield are all but relegated from their respective divisions.
When asked what would be her one thing for graduates and new designers starting up to bear in mind, her answer was simple and clear: “It’s your business, you have the answers”.
Needle and thread. Heavy duty thread works best
Things I am doing to prepare for David leaving :
The TV Land Awards will be broadcast Sunday at 9 p.m. ET PT on TV Land.
Kongs are a wonderful, wonderful invention. I always enjoy watching how different fosters/dogs approach this new-to-them mechanism. Teeny is a champion! She chews, throws, and licks every single bit of goodness out of her heavy duty kong.
"Half of the respondents said they bought a product in 2009 because of something they'd seen on a social networking site." "...a whopping 80% of the women polled said they had (become fans of brands or products)""...it is excellent data for retailers searching for clues about competing in this pinched consumer world."Well, this is pretty convincing stuff. And there was more. So I decided to explore a little further.
It was a ridiculously cold day and none of us were prepared with gloves or a hat, so we ducked into a lot of places to warm up and found some unexpected surprises. We ducked into this beautiful church, just a little after mass was over so the organ was still playing and people were coming and going. We also found a little Christmas Market filled with little gifts, food and ornaments. It was enclosed and another great break from the cold.
Me: I stayed home with you when you were sick last week. I can’t stay home today – I have too much to do.
Sheets said that while Shearing ceased working, he never stop playing piano.
The second final binding decision of the Sanhedrin was in 358, when the Hebrew Calendar was adopted. The Sanhedrin was dissolved after continued persecution by
On nights like tonight I think about that Chinese couple. I have no idea if they live in England, or moved back to China, or if life brought them somewhere else. I like to think that, wherever they are, they’re fighting cancer and cooking together each and every night. It’s a comforting thought.
He said these voters were seeking changes for a better government, a fairer and freer election process and media, an open society and a less corrupted administration.
So, I'm a sucker for participating in things, I think. Marie at A Sewing Odyssey noted that she is participating in the Pay It Forward fun for 2012, and I thought I would also join in. Though I wasn't one of her first three commenters, she kindly has offered to make me something anyway, so I will return the sentiment and offer you lovely readers the same option!
Money quotes: “Oh, your son is not in daycare? But he has to go to daycare. He needs that and you need to work.” That, of course, and this:
In short, object-oriented philosophy involves a fairly general set of minimal standards that leaves a good bit of room for personal variation. You can agree with Whitehead rather than me and still be an object-oriented philosopher. My own version has not just one, but two basic principles:
Trays. They are made out of soft plastic and just fit the depth of my refrigerator. Now when I want something all I have to do is pull out the tray and I have access to the very back. And as a bonus feature the glass shelf of the fridge won’t get dirty.
John was hit in the chest while Gerry was shot in the arm. Despite the hail of bullets, passers-by intervened and dragged Gerry to safety but John was already dead. The civilians who came to their aid also managed to recover their weapons and get them out of the area.
Currently I feel frustrated at the amount of time it takes between finding a large tumor and receiving an official diagnosis. At least if they tell me it’s definitely cancer we can move on to doing something about it. Patience is not my strong suit. Waiting just sucks.
2) For aspiring cooks, remember to add fresh herbs to the pan last. If they’re added too soon, the herbs will lose flavor.
As you can see from the chart, the indicator is now almost back down to its lower extremes. Earlier this week the lowest it reached was 24. That is still a bit away from the lows it reached last summer but it is enough to warrant lightening any short positions.
Most fun presentation-wise was the Broken Walnuts, toasted and salted with Cool Milk Cream and Armagnac Jelly. The chocolate walnut shells cracked open to reveal amber-hued Armagnac jelly which was a perfect sweet boozy foil to the goat’s cheese and milk ice cream. It was a great combination of flavours that was well-complemented by the thick toffee and caramel notes of the Fernando de Castilla Pedro Ximenez chosen for us by the sommelier.
Here's the full list of breweries attending:
You’re husband offers you a cookie. Is it worth it? No. That was easy.
I received a Pami Pocket from Pam in exchange for an honest review.
Sadly at £59 or 75ml the full bottle is out of my price range at the moment, so I won;'t own that beautiful bottle :( But I'll be enjoying my little sample vial!
Tracey glanced sideways at me with a look of vague suspicion, the unspeakable question in her eyes.
Many health seekers in India will also incorporate biomedicine into their religious healing approach. Even though psychiatric services are weak and very limited in many areas, many people suffering mental ailments will visit doctors and try psychiatric medication if it is accessible and affordable—particularly if they are diagnosed with serious mental illness.
Well, as you may know, I raised Sunny from a week and a half old and therefore, I had to take her with me if I was going to be gone for more than a couple of hours. That meant I had to feed her in the car. I was able to do this (after some practice bottle feeding) and she would eat, and then go to sleep. On her first vet visit she was fine in the car but when we got to the vet, she freaked out (understandable since she was getting vaccinated) and ever since, it has been a nightmare to travel with her because she gets carsick. Well, I know that she doesn't have an inner ear problem so she just freaks herself out. I have been working with her and getting her used to the carrier and today I made the step of taking her with me for a short trip in town. She was nervous but was NOT sick and was calm for the most part! So I would say we had success! Now for longer trips...
Book provided by publisher for review.
In third part of this work, Schenk devotes an entire chapter to examining the political, social, and military situations in Spain, Naples, and Greece and suggests that the revolutionary movements of these nations shortly after the Napoleonic Wars were suppressed by the European powers who aimed to maintain stability throughout the continent. Following an examination of these nations, Schenk recounts the events that he argues led to the dissolution of the Concert of Europe. These include France’s unilateral interference in 1823 to restore the Spanish monarchy, the competition between France, Spain, Great Britain, and the United States over trading rights and the revolutions in Latin American, and finally the competition between Britain and Russia in the Middle East. These great power competitions, argues Schenk, led to the disintegration of the Concert of Europe. In the epilogue, Schenk again returns to Tsar Alexander I and his ideas for a European alliance and seems to suggest that British interests, especially trading interests in the Middle East and Americans, were hostile to Alexander’s ideas and prevented the alliance system from working and that the constant competition between the powers demonstrate that Europe remained a secularized region that failed to embrace religion.
In a large bowl, take 1 tbsp of warm water ( luke warm ) add yeast and a tsp of sugar, leave it for sometime in a warm place, you will notice the yeast bubbling up, this way we will be sure that the yeast is still active.
1 1/2 cups shredded lettuce
Those four get a spot in the Championship line-up and a shot at Eternal Glory and a paid gig at VERSeFest.
The White Guardian later sent the Doctor, Ace and Benny on a quest to find the six segments of the Key to Time, scattered across the Doctor's personal timeline when he last disassembled it.
NAME ————- SAM MBA
And for the rest, what stops them from just not doing anything and still getting everything they need? Simple, if you don’t have any extenuating circumstances that reduces your work load then you need to be involved somehow in the world that provides for you to the best of your ability. If we don’t all pull together how can anyone expect to have their needs met? Whether this is taking a course, inventing something, finding an organization that is doing interesting things and supporting that, creating your own company or group of likeminded individuals, or even providing a local service to your community or building something new entirely – there will always be plenty to do.
I seem to be running late the past couple of weeks......the weather is great and a lot going on and I finally got some time to play this week. The tech from Technique Junkies was to do the Watercolor over White from the Bonus Section of the 2006 CD.
My roommate offered to pay for whatever else I needed, which I decided was an onion and a red and green bell pepper. I figured I could saute the onions and peppers for a bit, then layer it all in the hotdog buns along with some sliced porkchops and cheese. Throw it under the broiler and hey, I've got something semi-healthy that both my roommate and boyfriend will eat.
Name: Jessica Silva
ES: Training has been an interest of mine for a long time. I actually opened up a personal training studio inNew York when I got out of school. I also coached wrestling for a while.
5th CFL-1 Mike Grant
Last night, we talked about our child's conscience. We talked about how, when our children are young, we are dealing more in their "prohibitive conscience." That's fear of punishment. "I must do this or else..." As they get older, we want to transition into their "positive conscience." This is "I will do this because it's right." We want to teach them to do things because it's the right thing to do, not because they think they will get in trouble.
2 cups poha or beaten rice
Resins : Shabby Chic Treasures by Ingvild Bolme for Prima Marketing
Also, this "condo boom" hasn't been seamless at all, and the story doesn't reflect that - there's still a huge hole at Franklin and Eastern, where one of these glassy condos was supposed to go, there are more holes or half-built hulks rotting over on St. Marks and Bergen just east of Grand, many of these buildings took far longer to complete than they were supposed to, and despite the official sales stats, I'm not convinced anyone actually lives in some of them (like Ishi). The condo boom might be peripherally indicative of neighborhood change, but it's definitely not at the heart of the story.
It’s a good movie. Just not a great one.
Hall's sad bit of Stemleresque parroting/parody aside, hearty congratulations to Irv Stumler for his comments (see excerpt below) at Thursday night's public hearing to discuss the recently released "predetermined results courtesy of your nearest oligarch" ORBP economic impact study.
So we better call the calling off off.
upon a time. Last year, he worked as a media relations intern for the Carolina Hurricanes. He is currently working in the exciting field of new media, editing multimedia college sports text message alerts. Next year, he will be attending law school (not sure where yet).
Empyreumatic. There's that word again. I seem to remember last time it came up that we agreed it means burnt. Odd that it's considered a fault. I thought black malt was meant to taste burnt. Crispy golden black. just like bacon.
i. A community service obligation of 3 months, the details of which shall be made known to him in due course. Upon satisfactorily completing the community service obligation, he may be allowed to graduate, but no earlier than the end of Semester 1, AY2012/2013;
I’ve been working on the Klaus Kroak project for just short of 3 years now, and so far I have shared little of the concepts that inspire the music. So where better to share these words than on WordPress…
I want to post a video but somehow this just feels more right than Cripple Creek, so here’s to you Mr. Helm: I wish you safe travels to wherever the next world takes us, thanks for the music, thanks for the good times.
In straightforward terms, the above passage states that we need to add moral excellence (virtue) to our faith. Moral excellence embraces the concepts of honesty, decency, and other ethical codes that identifies us as Christians. To moral excellence we need to add knowledge, which obviously implies that we have to constantly nourish our minds with trustworthy information, truthful facts, and accurate data, which in this day-and-age are fast becoming scarce commodities, - but if our virtues are in order and our minds are sober, then we’ll be able to sift the good from the bad without too much effort. The next step requires that we nurture our knowledge with self-discipline (temperance), which also entails that we must guard the tongue and do things in moderation.
- Writers Beware (this is an understandable mistake, since our warnings are aimed at all writers. However, we wanted our name to be declarative. Hey! You over there! Writer! Beware!)
ginger and i wound up at a swingers party on the south side this weekend, an event whose sole purpose for existence is either "i'm tired of fucking my wife and she's okay watching me fuck you" or "i'm tired of fucking my husband and he's cool jerking off while i love up another woman." this is where it's at now, huh? secret internet friends and random partner swappage? remember that whole you're obviously jealous of my relationship thing? yeah, NEITHER DO I.
In his letter, Shaariibuu also pointed that he has complied with all the terms set by the courts to pursue the case including putting up a security bond of RM60,000 but nothing has been done, although the Mongolian government – which footed the deposit – had sent representatives over to discuss how to resolve the case.
Released in 1966 her Country Christmas album reached number 103 on the Billboard charts. Another great tune to be found on the album is I Won't Decorate Your Christmas Tree….now what did I say about risque.
There is plenty of snow to be up close and personal with the northern california kayak to visit Southern California wedding stuns even the northern california floods where pastoral California weddings in Santa Cruz are cozy and elegant at the northern california floods, proposed a split of California at San Luis Obispo. The southern part of a lifetime.
But nobody who I know that wears the things have ever CALLED them comfortable.
So not all crowds are monstrous, it seems. Some of them are quite nice.
Avira is a German antivirus software company. Its antivirus applications are based on the AntiVir antivirus engine, first launched in 1988. It was called “H+BEDV Datentechnik GmbH” when it was founded. One of the antivirus software, AntiVir Personal, is free for personal usage. Avira is launching a new, comprehensive protection package for end-users as well as small offices and home workers: the Avira Premium Security Suite is a combination of Aviraï¿½s brand-new firewall and the proven anti-virus software AntiVir Personal Premium.
Finally, on March 27th 2003, after 6 months of intensive rehearsals, The GrandMothers of Invention took the stage to a standing room only audience in Leipzig, Germany. This event was recorded, filmed, and released by Warner Classics in Europe, and has been broadcast and re-broadcast repeatedly on European television. Due to the overwhelming demand since then, they have performed more than 140 concert events across America, Canada and Europe, performance providing indisputable proof that "THEY CAN (AND DO) STILL DO THAT ON STAGE!"
17 Lucky Number
Romance writer Imari Jade lives in Marrero, Louisiana where she works as a financial analyst. Her hobbies are reading and watching Japanese anime, dramas and manga. She doesn’t drive, she’s afraid to fly, and gets most of her writing done on public transit to and from work. The New Orleans born Virgo is single and loving it. She loves Korean Pop music, especially the groups JYJ, B2ST, MBLAQ and TVXQ. Her dream is to one day travel to South Korea and meet her idols.
Instead of getting better, things went from bad to worse. Much worse. I wasn’t coping at all, and spent most of my days shouting at the children to be quite, keep still, and so forth and then one day I reached the end of my tether.
Quinn’s fourth fabulous mystery (see WALLA WALLA SUITE and HOMICIDE, MY OWN) is an excellent thriller filled with twists that keep readers wondering what next as nothing is quite like it seems. The heroine has a need to know re Krapp though she wishes that wasn’t so while the Bruno scenario just will not go away. With Beckman encouraging her to get involved and help on his case while assisting her with the calls, readers will appreciate Quinn’s adventures as she is caught in the crosshairs by The Other Romanian.
In our judgment, it’s also easy to forget that these men have wives and families and lives. They’re husbands, fathers, brothers, and friends. It’s easy to forget that some of them (and according to media reports, at least one) are likely fellow followers of Christ. It’s easy to forget that in many ways we are just like them. It’s easy to forget that we are just as capable of such sin. It’s easy to throw the first stone. It’s easy to forget the way that life breaks down when we sin against one another. It’s easy to forget how much our sin affects the people that we have promised to cherish.
“Thanks for the flattery, son.” They crossed to the living room area in the studio unit. Aryc sat in a recliner, while Gunther resumed his position on the couch. “I’m here on business, Gunny. Darky sent me to make sure you don’t expose any of us.”
10. I close my pillow openings with a ladder stitch - and the following is taken from a previous Christmas ornament tutorial, but is the exact same instruction for closing the pillows.
Irrational Fear #1
The Danish government allowed the creation of Shari’a courts to allow Muslims to resolve marriage, divorce and inheritance-related issues in accordance with Shari’a law. Strictly speaking, participation was optional, with any Muslim being free to insist on dealing with these matters via the existing court system. In practice however, community pressures up to and including the threat of violence forced many Muslims, particularly women, to deal with the Shari’a courts against their will.
6) Masculine Christianity’s Problem One of the major issues today is the rise of education among women, making some men feel intimidated.
Q Three of my staff have got volunteer positions at the Olympics. I can only let one go. What’s the best way of handling this?
I have no bones about admitting who I am. And who I am, among other things-- a giant, a longhair, a lover of cephalopods-- is an unabashed hopeless romantic. I've been single for way too damned long at this point and I yearn for the day when a stable girl who loves stuff like squids and Slowdive and Nocturnus and long walks on the beach enters my life.
When Jill was battling cancer, I prayed every day for a miracle to spare her life. I prayed alongside literally hundreds of friends and people who knew and loved Jill. I couldn't understand how my loving and compassionate God could allow such a horrifying thing to happen to such a beautiful person. I couldn't understand how the God I knew could sit there and watch her suffer and die in such an abhorrently terrible way and not do anything about it. And I couldn't understand how the God I knew could ignore all the prayers of all the people who loved her and prayed for her.
So that’s one part X Factor, one part Britain’s Got Talent and one part funfair ride! Confused yet?
Feeling less "unbalanced" and having had a "family" discussion about it, I wanted them to know where I was mentally and emotionally we then headed out and had a great evening at the regular Nag's Head (Rochester) Songwriters Night. I debuted a new song written only last Sunday when in one of my "noodling sessions" I hit on a nice little chord pattern and a vocal line and lyric hit me almost simultaneously - the planets must have been in some conjunction. It was a "work in progress" right up until we left for the pub with me rewriting the last verses lyrics minutes before departure! I described it as a bit of a "new born babe" of a song, normally these things have much longer gestation periods in my head, hands and private rehearsal before they are introduced to the ugly world out there. It is in C as well - I have been wracking my brains but in 40 years of song writing of those I remember - I do still play for my own pleasure stuff I wrote when I was 15 or 16 you know! Songs about King Arthur in Em and 5/4 anyone? I thought not. Anyways, I cannot think of any another song I've ever written in C - clearly I'm too sharp for that or feel a need to flatten the mood... *Pause* ... *Watch tumbleweed roll down street*... Right even old musos among you probably didn't get that awful gag. Moving on...
Except after I did it and I was driving past him I took a look and he kind of sort of looked like Benicio Del Toro. Well, maybe a lot like him.
It's also become a great investment that will pay for itself in time saved in your customer's calling experience, such as group pick-up, and multi-party conference calling. As your company to achieve your digital signage in order to be figured out by simply everyone in the nec multisync lcd 1530v as well as provide prospective and current network to reduce costs even more.
SDTAV Blog (sdtavblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
Frankly, I resent the implication of your message that I have nothing better to do than infiltrate the bedrooms of upper class women and listen to them making love. I am a busy gorilla with affairs to manage and have no time for such frivolous activities. I suggest that you further your enquiries with the Mistress of Girton College, Cambridge.
One of the problems of having blogged for so long, since 2006 if you can believe it, is that I often feel like I'm repeating myself. When I mentioned this to an agent friend of mine who also blogs, she said that I simply can't worry about it.
1st Period Wind Ensemble — Thursday, April 19th
For ancient Celts, the mistletoe was a symbol of fertility and rebirth, as it is an evergreen parasite that clings to its host even after the host tree has died.
The 24 elders are elsewhere depicted as wearing white robes and golden crowns, which means they are kings LIKE Jesus who is also shown to be wearing a golden crown. Never are angels depicted with such adornment or office, and angels are never referred to as “elders”(presbyteros). As well, the number 24 finds precedent in the fact that there were 24 divisions within the priesthood of Israel. Therefore, the scriptures are clear as to the identity of the 24 elders. They are indeed the holy ones, and they are indeed in heaven.
Character's clothing disappears then reappears turned inside out on the character (does not affect metal armor or footwear).
On 14 February 2002, 17-year-old Owain Leeson died in the Northern General Hospital after he was stabbed in the car park of Sheffield’s Uropa nightclub.
First act was Mark Felgate. He has a brilliant way of using ventriloquism in his act without having a dummy. He’s a bright and breezy kind of guy, very likeable, sufficiently silly and with a good rapport.
“I’m in love with a girl who knows me better. Fell for the woman just when I met her. Took my sweet time when I was bitter. Someone understands. And she knows how to treat a fella right. Give me that feeling every night. Wants to make love when I wanna fight. Now someone understand me. I’m in love with a girl, I’m in love with a girl, in love with a girl. And her name is YOU.”
If a marketer is brave (and clever) enough to carry out an ambush marketing campaign, creativity is the key. A creative way to gain access to the platform of thousands and thousands from your target market. A creative way to reach your customers without telling them anything about your brand. A creative way to ensure that maximum return on your marketing tactics that costs nothing. Even though the risk is high, but the gains outweigh them anyday.
The pace slows down for ‘Watch How You Go‘ that shows the clarity of the production. “The things we have shared, will soon be left behind now“, sparks a glorious choral middle to the song. This is possibly one of Tim Rice-Oxley‘s more refined compositions on this album. ‘Sovereign Life Cafe‘ soon brings back the zest to the album. It seems to be a song describing that they are at their most happiest when in their local surroundings even though there are many distractions out there to tempt them. The driving drums of Richard Hughes shape the track ‘On The Road‘ perfectly a sure-fire single at some point I would most definitely say. With the break in the middle you can imagine their fans clapping along when they will perform this live.
And what could possibly have possessed you not to make this the gambling paradise of Asia? You know luxury and service, and all the extra stuff outside of that (alcohol, hotel rooms) you can provide for cheap, allowing someone to enter and get caught in the dream, and that’s when you reel the margins in!
I created this piece in a moment when I was full of joy and gratitude. The bright yellow of the tulips symbolized my overflowing happiness and the snippet of blue sky symbolized never ending gratitude.I wanted the inky colors to flow and drip into each other freely because that is how my excitement felt...unrestrained! I get happy every time I look at this piece. It is a reminder of a great time in my life.
Khrys was still thinking about Sorlyna. As his horse sauntered on, he turned his gaze toward the river. Much of it was tranquil, hold for tiny little waves that rippled throughout in discordant patterns. As he was about to turn his head, he noticed one of the waves moved against the current. At that moment he realized that all of them did so. He shot he eyes to the other side of the bridge and saw the same little ripples moving around in the water.
I remembered reading that the ACV could treat BURNS!!! I quickly dabbed a small amount on the burn ( a slight ting) the burn WAS..about 1/2 and inch long and a bubble. Each day I applied a dab whenever I was in my kitchen...and before bedtime.
We had now been in the Hotel five months, and mum, bedridden, soiled and dreadlocked took a turn for the worse... she got depressed! That on top of being suicidal was bad news. Now, for some unknown reason, she could no longer bare living in the Hotel and all we heard were sobs and wails trailing from her room. That and the sound of neat vodka glugging its way out the bottle and down her throat. Lucky for us good news would soon arrive and a week later we would be gone.
"I saw terrible things... blood..." Abby whispered. Then she shrieked again and pointed at the doll with her free hand.
2. Not filthy talk
Try chasing Osama Bin Laden instead of wasting taxpayer money on chasing imaginary Milk Nymphos. Human trafficking, sexual exploitation of children, and the health safety and welfare of those exploited in the sex trade should be much higher on law enforcement priorities.
Embryonic specialist Andres Carrasco decided to investigate the health effects of glyphosate for himself after hearing so many reports by desperate peasant and indigenous communities who were suffering from exposure to toxic herbicides. According to Dr. Carrasco, his studies show glyphosate exposure can cause defects in the brain, intestines, and hearts of amphibian fetuses, and these results can be applied to humans. Moreover, the amount of Roundup used on genetically engineered soy fields was as much as 1,500 times greater than that which created the defects.
You may not know this artist, but she’s got something good going. Introducing Natalia Kills. An English recording artist and songwriter, she’s worked with the likes of Kesh Kumari, English fashion designer, stylist and photographer who I happen to follow on Twitter and have written about in previous posts. This is ultimately how I got to know of Kills. I’m intrigued by her artistic representation of herself or moreso her brand. Makes her music that much more interesting I reckon.
Yeah - Take a look at my BEFORE photos and you'll see why I think maybe I was a little TOO into this activity. Aaaaanyyyywaaaaayyyy....
I wanted another small project bag and when I saw the fabric this one is made with, well....it was a done deal! It's hand made, well made, and about 8 inches long and 3.5 inches wide/high. Perfect for socks or mittens/gloves. I got it from an Etsy shop: ZigZag Stitches There's another bag there I want, but I need to wait a bit. I'm hoping it will still be there when I can order. If not, it wasn't meant to be.
In spite of all this time this must take, Nicola is doing various guest blogs as part of a virtual book tour to launch Wasted and, on The Book Maven, she will be talking about points in the year, such as May 1st (or Beltane or Walpurgis Night) when we might realise how superstitious many of us are.
Studio Calico Shine Mr. Huey painted on butterfly.
Just take that few seconds to commit that smell to memory and, perhaps, one day you will be drinking that same beer and you will be back transported back to that exact moment in time of joy and companionship - and I hope it brings a smile to your lips as you take a salutary sip.
After a successful European tour, Lenny's later editions of 5 included "American Woman", a song used in the film Austin Powers: 'The Spy Who Shagged Me'.
I want to be really clear about this next point.
Rather than striving simply to update Sir Arthur Conan Doyle’s tales of London-based consulting detective Sherlock Holmes, writers Mark Gatiss and Steven Moffat have employed the shift from the late 19th century to the early 21st to crank up the volume on this sleuth as an anachronism. As played by Benedict Cumberbatch, Holmes is a creature of the intellect, mostly misanthropic, thoroughly blind to the niceties of modern civilization, and so unfamiliar with the customs of contemporary celebrity that he thinks he can go about his business of freelance ratiocination--showing off!--without hindrance from the law or the media. Yet, his coldly cerebral pursuit of audacious malefactors continues to endear him to today’s TV audiences. This is credited largely to the fact that we see Holmes in the BBC series the same way we did in Conan Doyle’s tales--through the compassionate eyes of his far-less-perfect chronicler and companion, Dr. John Watson (Martin Freeman), who must frequently remind the detective to keep his too-honest opinions to himself and demonstrate at least some of the manners expected in human interaction. Holmes comes off in Sherlock as at once disturbingly superior and deserving of our sympathies. We laugh at his eccentricities and moments of eye-rolling arrogance, but want to save him from his own manifest weaknesses.
- 2 large eggs
I can't believe how the dollmaking community has grown since I hopped on the bandwagon in the early 2000's. It's just amazing. Doll makers are the BEST!
Session 1, ON-campus (tuition, room & board): $1655
Cravings: this week it's Lucky Charms cereal. I wake up at 4am on the dot every morning and get a bowl. Joel doesn't like this so much because he can hear me, "feeding." That word didn't go over to well.
I wonder though, should they?
91. One, one dutty build dam. Every little bit adds up.
Burton mistakenly put 85% of the his effort in making the film about Barnabas, and the ridiculous situations he gets into, that he leaves about seven important characters fighting for the remaining 15% of the film. Characters become one dimensional and stale, not living up the potential they posses. Pfeiffer does a decent job as Elziabeth, but her hard-nosed exterior gets boring quick. Haley is tremendous as Willie, while Heathcote is pretty on the eyes, but a bit flimsy with the acting.
If there's one thing that really, really bugs me, it's false self-righteousness when it comes to entertainment.
This poem is simply wonderful. Three words that caught me are; while on earth, we should be useful, be contented and be successful. We should trust God for every provision and leave the fears, doubts and despairs and just have the faith that everything is in order.
Remembrance is of the past,
I actually used the wheelchair as a shopping cart, holding all our various bags, bottles of water, etc. Santa Fe is supposedly the oldest town in the United States and the cobblestones and narrow sidewalks make riding in the chair a nightmare! I tried it, only to literally jump out and refuse to be pushed until I hollered "uncle"...talk about rough! The walk felt good.
I had a dream about you, you were wearing this red dress and we were sitting at a piano and I could tell we hadn’t seen each other in a long time.
